http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_fe_st/odd_disc_jockey_rescue Listener helps save ailing disc jockey helps save ailing disc jockey 2 hours, 23 minutes ago SHELBY, N.C. - A radio listener helped save a disc jockey who suffered an on-air seizure and pleaded for help before passing out in his studio. WOHS DJ Tim Biggerstaff, who has suffered from diabetes since childhood, has always been candid about his health. When he felt a seizure about to strike Monday, he called out to his listeners. Gerald Weathers heard the plea and raced to the nearby studio. Since Biggerstaff was the only person working on the holiday, officials contacted another WOHS radio employee to unlock the door. Biggerstaff was found unconscious inside. "It's quite frankly a bloody miracle that I am here at all," said Biggerstaff, 46. This isn't the first time a listener has saved the DJ's life. Three years ago, a listener donated a kidney to him when he needed a transplant. Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Amputee uses crutch to fight off gunmen Most Viewed: Odd News Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Indian lawyers tie man to tree, beat him Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Odd News - Video Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Mail Delivered: Rain, Sleet, or Zero Gravity? AM ET Will You E-Marry Me? May 29, 11:32 PM ET Leapin&#39; Lizards: Reptile on the Loose May 29, 10:36 PM ET with Bad Credit refinance requests only. An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty Get the latest news, photos and video of the funky, and weird. &raquo; More at CNN.com Latest news on the strange, quirky and just plain odd. &raquo; More at USATODAY.com
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/billy_graham_library By RACHEL ZOLL, AP Religion Writer CHARLOTTE, N.C. - Visitors to the new, presidential-style museum honoring evangelist Billy Graham enter and exit the building through crosses as tall as 40 feet high, a design meant to emphasize that the $27-million complex is an extension of the minister's work. "My hope is there will be thousands of people who come here every year and accept Jesus Christ as their savior," said the Rev. Franklin Graham, son and successor to his father, the world's most widely heard preacher. On Thursday, former Presidents Carter, Clinton and George H.W. Bush were expected to be among 1,500 well-wishers at the private dedication of the Billy Graham Library in Charlotte. Billy Graham, 88, suffers from fluid on the brain, prostate cancer and Parkinson's disease, and is largely confined to his home in Montreat. Still, he was scheduled to speak at the ceremony. It will take place in view of his childhood home, which was moved to the library site and restored. His wife Ruth, 86, has degenerative osteoarthritis of the back and neck and is bedridden at their home. Billy Graham has toured the museum, "tearing up" when he came to the room dedicated to Ruth, Franklin Graham said. His only complaint? "Too much Billy Graham," according to his son. The 40,000-square-foot complex was built on the grounds of the Billy Graham Evangelistic Association, and among its designers was the ITEC Entertainment Co., of Orlando, Fla., which has done work for Disney and other theme parks. The dairy farm where the preacher grew up is just a few miles from the site and the library reflects his roots. The cavernous lobby is meant to resemble a barn with scattered bales of hay and milk cans. The sounds of a cackling chicken and neighing horse are piped in. The first Bible verse Graham's mother taught him, John 3:16, "For God so loved the world that he gave his one and only Son," is engraved onto a rafter. To the right is a cow shed, where a display that has drawn the most curiosity stands. An animatronic black-and-white cow named Bessie says in a southern drawl that Graham has been "preaching the pure milk of God's word for 60 years." Bessie tells kids to "get moo-ving" to learn more about the preacher. Critics have dubbed the display the "Golden Calf" and say it cheapens Billy Graham's legacy. But Franklin Graham said it is meant as an appeal to children. The museum, which reporters toured before the ceremony Thursday, is more heartfelt tribute than scholarly review. Graham's personal papers will be stored at the museum, while documents related to his crusades will remain in an archive at Wheaton College, the prominent evangelical school in Illinois where the minister and his wife met as students. There are photos of Graham with the U.S. presidents he befriended going back six decades, and displays of gifts they gave him, including a golf club and a check that President Nixon had given the preacher as an offering. However, there is no mention of how Graham's close ties with Nixon had cast a shadow on the minister. Old TV sets broadcast clips of the troubled times in America when Graham preached, including the Civil Rights era. Graham has been praised for integrating his crusades starting in 1953, but also criticized for his restrained support for the movement. Designers have recreated the scene of Graham's 1949 Los Angeles tent revival, dubbed the "Canvas Cathedral," that lasted for weeks, drawing national attention to his ministry for the first time. A replica of the Berlin Wall is meant to underscore how remarkable it was that Graham won permission from communist governments to evangelize behind the Iron Curtain. Billy Graham's children have been divided over where their parents should be buried &#151; at the library or at The Cove, a Bible training center near the Grahams' home. Franklin Graham believes his parents have decided the location, but "haven't made that public yet." A trip through the museum ends with video from the crusades, now called festivals, that Franklin Graham leads as chief executive of the evangelistic association. Asked for his thoughts on the state of evangelism, Franklin Graham warned about a creeping "liberalism" that is leading people to question the authority of Scripture. "Every generation, liberalism comes into the church. Men and women take their eyes off the cross," he said. "My father didn't offer multiple roads to God. He offered one road." Billy Graham Evangelistic Association: minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Visitors walk through a hallway of lighted crosses at the Billy Graham Library in Charlotte,...
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/spelling_bee Top spellers move to bee's final rounds spellers move to bee's final rounds By JOSEPH WHITE, PM ET WASHINGTON - For most kids, the appearance of the word "Bewusstseinslage" on any kind of test would be reason to shriek in horror. For Matthew Evans, it was cause for joy. "My favorite word!" said the 12-year-old boy from Albuquerque, N.M. The 80th Scripps National Spelling Bee began by reducing the record field of 286 spellers to 59 on Wednesday. Those who survived will return for the semifinals and finals Thursday, and the champion will be crowned on prime-time national television. Most of the winnowing was done with a 25-word multiple-choice test, followed by three oral rounds that featured a display of confidence, nervousness and befuddlement &#151; not to mention sheer relief when a guess proved correct. "Yes!" exclaimed 12-year-old Tia Thomas of Coarsegold, Calif., who pumped her fists and skipped back to her seat after correctly spelling "periostracum" (the hard covering of a mollusk shell). "I was pretty sure I knew the word," Tia said. "But the 'peri' part was guessing." Matthew and Tia, both in the national bee for the fourth time, are two of the favorites to become the champion. The winner receives $35,000 cash, a $5,000 scholarship, a $2,500 savings bond and a complete set of reference works. Achieving that goal will require outlasting 13-year-old Samir Patel of Colleyville, Texas, who is back for the fifth year after placing third, 27th, second and 14th. With his grandfather from India &#151; visiting the United States for the first time &#151; sitting on the front row, Samir breezed through "decor" in the preliminary round, and "trumpery" (of low quality) and "sunglo" (a green Chinese tea) in the quarterfinals. "I'm a lot more prepared than I was the first year," Samir said. "I'm not as nervous, and I already know sort of the routine, so I'm not so much worried about 'Am I going to be there on time?' 'Am I going to make a mistake in walking down the stage?'" Far removed from the glamour of the rounds that will be televised on ESPN and ABC on Thursday, the bee started early in the morning in a setting that more closely resembled a classroom of students taking the SAT. Spellers from English-speaking parts of the world filled in ovals with their No. 2 pencils during the multiple-choice test, which included words ranging from "icicle" to "ylem" (a hypothetical substance from the early universe). Matthew was happily surprised when he saw that the 25th word was Bewusstseinslage (a state of consciousness, pronounced bay-VOOHST-sines-lahg-eh), which he likes "just because it's so weird-sounding." "I was like, 'Oh my goodness. Wow! This is awesome,'" said Matthew, who got 24 of 25 correct. Then all of the spellers were given their only guaranteed moment on the Grand Hyatt's ballroom stage: a chance to spell one word before the audience of parents, friends and judges. "Macaroni &#151; what does it mean?" asked 14-year-old Michael Yeh of Kokomo, Ind., exercising his right to ask for a definition before correctly spelling the popular food. The multiple choice test (worth 25 points) and the preliminary oral round (worth three points) narrowed the field to 107. Thirteen more were eliminated in the next round, and 35 heard the telltale bell signaling an incorrect response in the day's final round. Every year there are spellers who have their own quirks to help them stay focused. This year, some wrote letters in the air, others on their hands. Jonathan Horton, 14, of Gilbert, Ariz., who finished in a tie for sixth last year, has developed a rhythm in which he turns his head and appears to feign a cough several times while spelling a word. He did it four times while working through the 10 letters of "exhilarate." "I say a couple of letters into my hand, and then I say them out loud," said Jonathan, who also advanced to the semifinals. "I do that because I don't want to say the wrong letter out loud." Aishwarya Pastapur of Overland Park, Kan., made her feelings known by wearing a T-shirt with the words "mishpelt werds eeritate me." She displayed no irritation whatsoever by correctly spelling "enumerated" in the preliminaries, but she was stumped by "coadunation" (union of a large body) in the quarterfinals. Kennyi Aouad, 11, of Terre Haute, Ind., became a crowd favorite after he couldn't stop laughing when he was given the funky-sounding word "Sardoodledom" (a melodramatic plot). He finally composed himself and asked all sorts of questions about the word &#151; definition, part of speech, alternate pronunciations, use in a sentence &#151; then tried to get an unallowable hint by asking: "Is it kind of like kingdom?" He could hardly believe it when he spelled the word correctly. Scripps National Spelling Bee: Full Coverage: National Spelling Bee Billboard misspells bee contestant's name AP 17 Canadian 2nd in U.S. spelling bee at Toronto Star (reg req'd), Jun 02 Canadian teen comes close to spelling bee immortality at CBC, Jun 02 Bee participant says spelling is important at The Free Lance-Star, Jun 02 Don't bee cruel: How the big spelling contest should change at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), Jun 01 Boy Wants To Leave 'Em Spellbound At National Bee at The Tampa Tribune., May 31 Spelling bee has no business being in ESPN's vocabulary at Baltimore Sun (reg. req'd), Jun 02 at International Herald Tribune, Jun 02 minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Kennyi Aouad, 11, of Terre Haute, Ind., bursts into laughter when asked to spell the...
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/community_air_police NY teens ready to gauge air pollution teens ready to gauge air pollution By COLLEEN LONG, AM ET NEW YORK - Teenagers from a Brooklyn neighborhood surrounded by power plants, a waste-transfer station and a busy expressway will soon take to the streets to monitor the pollutants residents are breathing. After completing training, volunteers from a New York-based Hispanic community organization, UPROSE, will use handheld devices to monitor levels of nitrogen dioxide, sulfur dioxide, carbon monoxide and other particles in the air in Sunset Park. Their efforts are part of a wider campaign to map air quality in several urban U.S. neighborhoods. "In order for us to really change things, we need to know what's there on a daily basis," said Frank Torres, director of youth leadership for UPROSE. "We want to educate the community, put the power in their hands so they can change their surroundings." More than 90 percent of Hispanics and 86 percent of blacks in the U.S. live in urban settings, which are typically at higher risk for air pollution, according to the . Hispanics are more than twice as likely as non-Hispanics to live in places that fall short of EPA standards for airborne particle matter. "We don't give a unified health message to people," said Jane Delgado, president of the National Alliance for Hispanic Health, which is charting data from similar projects in Detroit, Watsonville, Calif., and Brownsville, Texas. "We tell people go out and exercise, but for some kids, breathing the air in their communities will contribute to asthma attacks and other problems. We need to know exactly what is going on near our homes." Some air pollutants commonly found in urban areas can cause skin and eye irritation, as well as asthma, particularly in children. Paula Gomez, head of the Brownsville Community Health Center near the U.S.-Mexico border, said spikes in asthma attacks in that area occur when winds blow from the south, where more than 150 factories that produce electrical devices and plastics are located. "At night you can sometimes smell the chemicals in the air," she said. Data collection will continue for about six months, after which the alliance will create an interactive report using Google maps. It hopes eventually to collect air quality data from 20 locations, Delgado said. "We need good data, close to the ground, collected by people in the communities," she said. "If more people were concerned about emissions, their concerns would be answered by the government. By not keeping good data, it makes it hard to have a whole response." The project is funded by grants, mostly from the Kellogg Foundation, Delgado said. It costs about $2,500 to equip each of the four cities with the technology, including a GPS, video camera and the pollution detectors. Wade McGillis, a professor in Columbia University's department of Earth and environmental sciences, said the handheld devices are a good tool to get community members involved, but that data should also be collected by stationary monitors, which provide more accurate readings and would be less prone to human error. minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/marines_haditha Marine describes Haditha death scene describes Haditha death scene By THOMAS WATKINS, PM ET CAMP PENDLETON, Calif. - An officer who saw the corpses of Iraqi women and children sprawled across a bed in a home said Wednesday in recorded testimony that he believed that "my Marines were doing the right thing" when they killed them. Marine 1st Lt. Max Frank, whose deposition was recorded in March before his return to , was the first witness to be heard at a preliminary hearing for Lt. Col. Jeffrey Chessani, the commander of the Marine battalion involved in the deadly sweep of the village of Haditha. The sweep led to the deaths of 24 people on Nov. 19, 2005, after a roadside bomb killed a lance corporal driving a Humvee. In the aftermath, Marines went house to house looking for insurgents. "From my perspective at the time, my assumption was my Marines were doing the right thing," Frank said. "I rationalized it to myself as they were taking fire. The Marines could have come in, yelled at them to come out, and when they didn't come out they cleared the room with a fragmentation grenade." Frank, a platoon commander, said he saw a total of 24 bodies, including five men who had been shot beside a white car, an elderly man whose leg had been eviscerated, and a woman and child curled up in another home. Chessani, 43, is charged with dereliction of duty on suspicion of failing to investigate the killings. He is the highest-ranking of seven Marines accused in the case. The Marines have said they believed they were taking fire from the houses. They used fragmentation grenades and machine guns to clear the homes, but instead of hitting insurgents, they killed civilians. Frank testified that he and another Marine loaded the corpses into Humvees. No one else wanted to perform the task, since there was a shortage of corpse-handling gloves and body bags. The bodies were first taken to a Marine base and then to the morgue in Haditha, where one Iraqi hospital worker vomited when he saw the corpses, Frank testified. "The Marines didn't believe it was a job they should do," Frank said. "A lot of the Marines were really disturbed by it." Frank is one of several Marines given immunity to testify. He said the consensus at the time was that the Iraqis died as the result of an insurgent-initiated attack, so there was no need to investigate the deaths further. The Article 32 hearing, similar to a civilian grand jury proceeding, will determine whether Chessani stands trial on charges of dereliction of duty and violating a lawful order for failing to investigate the deaths of the men, women and children. If convicted, he faces up to three years in prison. Chessani had inspected the general scene after the Nov. 19, 2005, killings and "saw no law-of-war violation," said his attorney Brian Rooney. He said Chessani immediately reported to his boss, the commanding officer for the 2nd Marine Regiment. At the time of the killings, there was no written Marine Corps policy that stated civilian deaths had to be investigated, Chessani's attorney told reporters. That changed in April 2006, probably in response to the Haditha killings, and Marine guidelines now emphasize the importance of investigating civilian deaths. The battalion's sergeant major, Edward Sax, who worked closely with Chessani, called his former boss "by far the strongest moral leader I have ever served with in my life" when he took the stand. Sax testified that members of the Haditha town council gave Chessani a written allegation that some of those slain had been rounded up and shot by Marines. Chessani dismissed the allegation as not credible since the Iraqis may have had ties to the insurgency, Rooney said. When asked whether Chessani would have investigated the deaths if he suspected the Marines had done something wrong, Sax replied: "Without batting an eye." The hearing is expected to last for 10 days, and Rooney said the defense would be calling about 25 witnesses, including a two-star general who knew about the killings but also did not order an investigation. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 27 minutes ago Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida AP, 30 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb at BBC, May 31 Search continues for Iraq Britons at BBC, May 31 The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 27 with Bad Credit refinance requests only. United States Marine Lt. Col. Jeffrey R. Chessani walks to a preliminary hearing where he... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/spain_treasure_ship Spain files claim over treasure ship files claim over treasure ship By PHIL DAVIS, Fla. - The Spanish government has filed claims in U.S. federal court over a shipwreck that a Florida firm found laden with colonial-era treasure, an attorney said Thursday. If the vessel was Spanish or was removed from that country's waters, any treasure would belong to Spain, said James Goold, an attorney representing the government. "It's a very well established principle under Spanish, U.S. and international law that a government such as the kingdom of Spain has not abandoned its sunken ships or sunken property, and that a company like Odyssey Marine Exploration may not conduct recovery operations without authorization by the government," he said. "The kingdom of Spain has not authorized any such operations by Odyssey, and by these legal actions it will see the return of any Spanish property Odyssey has recovered," Goold said of the claims filed Wednesday. Odyssey Marine Exploration Inc. CEO John Morris said in a statement Thursday that "such a move was anticipated by Odyssey and is considered normal in Admiralty cases." The company has previously said Odyssey would notify all claimants once it conclusively determined the ship's identity. Odyssey said it was not found in Spanish territorial waters. The company announced two weeks ago that it had discovered a shipwreck containing 500,000 gold and silver coins somewhere in the Atlantic Ocean. The Tampa-based company said the site was outside any country's territorial waters but would not give the exact location or name of the ship. Odyssey has said that the ship was not in Spanish territorial waters and was not the HMS Sussex, a shipwreck that Odyssey recently got permission from the Spanish government to search for in the Strait of Gibraltar. But Spain has called the new discovery suspicious and said the booty may have come from a wrecked Spanish galleon. In Britain, the find generated press reports that Odyssey had salvaged the wreck of the long-sought British vessel Merchant Royal, which sank in bad weather off England in 1641. Odyssey has not confirmed or denied these reports. Spain is using the U.S. law firm Covington & Burling, which has represented Spain over shipwreck cases before, including the recovery of material from two ships, Juno and La Galga, in a 2000 court case. The Spanish government won the case at that time. Odyssey shares rose 13 cents, about 2 percent, to $6.83 in volatile morning trading. Shares fell almost 4 percent early in the day. They have traded in a 52-week range of $1.52 to $9.45. Associated Press writers Jennifer Kay in Miami and Mar Roman in Madrid, Spain, contributed to this report. - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. this photo provided by Odyssey Marine Exploration, Ground crew members unload more than 17... Largest shipwreck treasure revealed
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/tuberculosis_infection COLLEEN SLEVIN, - The tuberculosis patient under the first federal quarantine since 1963 is a 31-year-old personal injury attorney who practices law with his father in Atlanta, a federal law enforcement official said Thursday. The official, who asked to remain anonymous because he was not authorized to talk about the case, identified the patient as Andrew Speaker. A medical official in Atlanta also confirmed the patient's name on condition of anonymity. The patient, who has a rare and dangerous form of tuberculosis, arrived at Denver's National Jewish Medical and Research Center for treatment Thursday, walking under his own power after flying from Atlanta with his wife and federal marshals. He looked healthy and tan, and "he said he still felt fine," hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. Doctors plan to begin treating the man immediately with two antibiotics, one oral and one intravenous. He also will undergo a basic physical exam, a test to evaluate how infectious he is and a CT scan and lung X-ray, Allstetter said. Doctors hope to also determine where he contracted the disease. He will be kept in a special unit with two rooms and a ventilation system, Allstetter said. "He may not leave that room much for several weeks," Allstetter said. The man knew he had TB when he flew from Atlanta to Europe in mid-May for his wedding and honeymoon, but he didn't find out until he was already there that it was an extensively drug-resistant strain considered especially dangerous. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, the man flew home for treatment. Health officials in North America and Europe are trying to track down about 80 passengers who sat near him on the two trans-Atlantic flights, and they want passenger lists from four shorter flights the man took while in Europe. Patients on the shorter flights are not expected to be as much at risk, health officials said. Among those being tested are more than two dozen University of South Carolina Aiken students, school spokeswoman Jennifer Lake said Thursday. Two were apparently sitting near the man, possibly in the same row, she said. One of those students, Laney Wiggins, said she is awaiting her skin test results, expected Friday. "I'm very nervous," Wiggins told The (Columbia) State newspaper. "It's kind of sad that this is overshadowing the wonderful time we had in Europe." The man flew to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385, also listed as Delta Air Lines codeshare Flight 8517, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. He and his bride also took four shorter flights while in Europe &#151; Paris to Athens on May 14; Athens to Thira Island May 16; Mykonos Island to Athens May 21; and Athens to Rome May 21 &#151; but officials said there was less risk of infection during the shorter hops compared to the trans-Atlantic flights, which each lasted eight hours or more. It was while the man was in Rome that he learned further U.S. tests had determined his TB was the rare, extensively drug-resistant form, far more dangerous than he knew. They told him turn himself over to Italian health officials and not to fly on any commercial airlines. Instead, on May 24, the man flew from Rome to Prague on Czech Air Flight 0727, then flew to Montreal aboard Czech Air Flight 0104 and drove into the U.S., according to CDC officials. Officials are trying to contact people who sat within five rows of him on the two longest flights for testing. Other passengers are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in the man was low, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. The infected man told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that doctors initially did not order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," he told the newspaper. Dr. Charles Daley, head of the infectious disease division at National Jewish Hospital, said the hospital has treated two other patients with what appears to be the same strain of tuberculosis since 2000, although that strain had not been identified and named at the time. He said the patients had improved enough to be released. "With drug-resistant tuberculosis, it's quite a challenge to treat this," Daley told CNN Thursday. "The cure rate that's been reported in other places is very low. It's about 30 percent for XDR-TB." "This is a different patient, though. We're told that this is very early in the course, and most of the time when we get patients that it's very extensive and very far advanced. So I think we're more optimistic," he said. "We're aiming for cure. We know it's an uphill battle, but we hope to get there." Associated Press writers Lara Jakes Jordan in Washington, and Mike Stobbe, Greg Bluestein and Daniel Yee in Atlanta contributed to this report. Public Health Agency of Canada: Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare TB patient in Denver for treatment AP US probes how TB traveler crossed border AP Man knew he had TB before flying to Europe at CNN.com, May 30 Tuberculosis - Getting the Facts at FOX News, May 31 Upset air travelers criticize CDC on TB alert at Atlanta Journal-Constitution, May 30 - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. airplane of Air France takes-off an overseas international airport, 24 May 2007. US health... Czech officials seek passengers exposed to TB Heath officials in the Czech Republic are joining in the search for passengers who may have sat near a man infected with a drug-resistant strain of tuberculosis. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video TB and border security A man with tuberculosis eluded authorities despite orders to stop him. CNN&#39;s Jeanne Meserve reports (May 30) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/hurricane_forecast hours, 42 minutes ago FORT COLLINS, Colo. - With the 2007 Atlantic hurricane season a few hours away, researcher William Gray released his newest forecast Thursday still showing an expectation for 17 named storms and nine hurricanes, five of them intense. Gray, based at Colorado State University, described it as a very active season. He said there was a 74 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall somewhere on the U.S. coast. There is a 50 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall on the East Coast, including the Florida Peninsula, according to the new forecast; the long-term average is 31 percent. The chance of a major hurricane hitting the Gulf Coast between the Florida Panhandle and Brownsville, Texas, is 49 percent; the long-term average is 30 percent. There is also an above-average chance of a major hurricane making landfall in the Caribbean, according to the forecast. Thursday's forecast was largely unchanged from Gray's last forecast, released in early April. "We expect an above-average hurricane season," said Phil Klotzbach, a member of Gray's team and lead author of the forecast. The Atlantic hurricane season, which runs from June 1 to Nov. 30, averages 9.6 named storms, 5.9 hurricanes and 2.3 intense hurricanes per year. There were 10 named Atlantic storms last year and five hurricanes, two of them major. None of the hurricanes hit the U.S. Atlantic coast. The devastating 2005 season set a record with 28 named storms, 15 of them hurricanes. Four hurricanes hit the U.S. coast, the worst among them Katrina, which devastated parts of the Gulf Coast. Full Coverage: Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Tropical Storm Barbara weakens in Mexico AP, Coast not ready for hurricanes AP, 1 hour, 52 minutes ago Drones Expected to Be New Eye Into Little-Seen Part of Hurricanes at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Oct 03 Your pictures: Preparing for Florence at BBC, Sep 11 Study Finds Hurricanes Frequent in Some Cooler Periods at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 24 Coastal areas brace for a busy season with 7 to 10 hurricanes forecast at Sun Sentinel, May 22 By any other name at The American Spectator, Sep 30 The next one kind as Ernesto at Miami Herald (reg. req'd), Aug 31 vet faces hearing over protest with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Bill Proenza, new director of the National Hurricane Center, talks to the media next to... Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Engineering students are simulating a hurricane&#39;s winds to build better houses. CNN&#39;s John Zarrella reports. (May 29) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Hurricanes and Tropical Storms &raquo; More News Feeds
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/boeing_cia_suit ACLU: Boeing offshoot helped CIA Boeing offshoot helped CIA By PAT MILTON, AM ET NEW YORK - A Boeing Co. subsidiary accused by the American Civil Liberties Union American Civil Liberties Union of facilitating torture by providing services to the for secret overseas flights said it does not, as a rule, inquire about its customers' business. The ACLU filed a lawsuit Wednesday claiming Jeppesen Dataplan, Inc., enabled the clandestine transportation of three terrorism suspects to secret overseas locations where they were tortured and subjected to other "forms of cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment." "We don't know the purpose of the trip for which we do a flight plan," said Mike Pound, a spokesman for Englewood, Colo.-based Jeppesen. "We don't need to know specific details. It's the customer's business, and we do the business that we are contracted for," he said. "It's not our practice to ever inquire about the purpose of a trip." The company had no immediate comment on specifics of the lawsuit. Jeppesen Dataplan provides flight plans, fuel, airport data and other services to its clients. The ACLU said Jeppesen Dataplan "either knew or reasonably should have known" that it was facilitating the torture of terrorism suspects by providing flight services to the CIA. Companies "are not allowed to have their heads in the sand and take money from the CIA to fly people, hooded and shackled, to foreign countries to be tortured," ACLU attorney Ben Wizner said. Boeing itself is not named in the lawsuit and would not confirm a Jeppesen-CIA link, spokesman Tim Neale said. He said customers have a confidentiality clause. The lawsuit was filed Wednesday in U.S. District Court in Northern California but announced in New York City. The three detainees have claimed through their family and lawyers that they have been tortured and abused against universally accepted legal standards. One claimed to have been routinely tortured under interrogation about al-Qaida and . The detainees' attorneys appealed to the ACLU for assistance. The cases involve the treatment of Binyam Mohamed, an Ethiopian citizen, in July 2002 and January 2004; Elkassim Britel, an Italian citizen, in May 2002; and Ahmed Agiza, an Egyptian citizen, in December 2001, ACLU officials said at a Manhattan news conference. Mohamed is currently being held in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba; Britel in Morocco and Agiza in Egypt, the ACLU said. The ACLU said the suspects were apprehended under the U.S. government's "extraordinary rendition program." Extraordinary rendition is the clandestine capture and transfer of suspects to be detained and interrogated in countries where the protections of U.S. laws do not apply, according to Wizner. "American corporations should not be profiting from a CIA rendition program that is unlawful and contrary to core American values," said Anthony D. Romero, the ACLU's executive director. "Corporations that choose to participate in such activity can and should be held legally accountable." Neither the CIA nor the U.S. government is named in the lawsuit. Wizner said the executive branch has invoked a state secrets defense in similar lawsuits. The Bush administration has insisted it receives guarantees from countries receiving terror suspects that prisoners will not be tortured. Associated Press writer Paul Elias in San Francisco contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Espionage & Intelligence Judge will release letters in Libby case AP, 4 minutes ago Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 22 minutes ago Shedding light on CIA mystery flights at BBC, May 23 CIA flights controversy here to stay at BBC, Feb 14 Advisers Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 30 Assessments Made in 2003 Foretold Situation in Iraq at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 20 at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 09 Tenet of the Iraq war at Christian Science Monitor, May 09 - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. tarmac of the Mihail Kogalniceanu Airbase, east of Bucharest, indicated by Human Rights Watch... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: American Civil Liberties Union
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_sc/space_station Space station gets protective shielding station gets protective shielding By MIKE SCHNEIDER, PM ET CAPE CANAVERAL, Fla. - Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Commander Fyodor Yurchikhin and flight engineer Oleg Kotov opened a hatch on the Russian side of the space station at 3:05 p.m. EDT. The spacewalk ended about 5 1/2 hours later. "Hooray! We're back home!" one of the cosmonauts said after climbing back into the space station airlock. The only lament from the first-time spacewalkers came at the end, from a cosmonaut who complained about an ill-fitted glove on his spacesuit. Both men were tethered during the spacewalk to keep them from floating away. The station's third occupant, U.S. astronaut Sunita Williams, remained inside. Space debris includes objects such as discarded rocket parts, planetary dust and rocks. Scientists consider it the greatest threat to the space station, orbiting about 220 miles above Earth. Kotov rode at the end of a crane operated by Yurchikhin to reach the stack of aluminum panels about 60 feet from the hatch. The 17 protective panels, each about 2 feet by 3 feet and weighing about 20 pounds, were delivered to the station last December and left outside in a formation dubbed "the Christmas tree." The cosmonauts installed five of the panels on a Russian section of the space station, and the others were to be put in place during a spacewalk next week. Engineers on the ground are able to monitor by radar the largest pieces of space debris &#151; objects larger than a softball &#151; and adjust the station's position accordingly, so the shielding will protect against smaller objects. "The consequence of small particles is not so great," said Kirk Shireman, 's deputy program manager for the space station. "Then there are the midrange particles. Those are the ones we worry about." An independent safety task force in February said that there was a 9 percent risk that the space station, once completed in 2010, could be hit with space debris severe enough to cause the loss of the outpost or crew members. That risk estimate was reduced to 5 percent if protective panels were installed on Russian portions of the space station. Sections of the space station built by NASA and the Japanese and European space agencies were protected sufficiently against space debris, the task force said. The spacewalk started about 45 minutes late, but a bright moon allowed the cosmonauts to catch up by working through what normally would have been darkness after orbital sunsets. The space station circles the Earth every 90 minutes. Asked by Mission Control in Moscow how it felt in their spacesuits once they were outside, one of the cosmonauts joked: "Kind of cloudy, a bit rainy. We didn't take an umbrella with us." The cosmonauts also successfully rerouted a cable for a navigation antenna that will be used later in the year for the first flight of a new European cargo vehicle. Wednesday's spacewalk was the first of two scheduled a week apart. Yurchikhin and Kotov will perform another one next Wednesday with similar tasks, including depositing canisters containing biological experiments outside the station. Space shuttle Atlantis and its seven astronauts are scheduled to fly to the station early next month. NASA managers on Wednesday began a two-day meeting at the to decide whether to go ahead with the planned June 8 launch. A final decision was expected Thursday for the launch, which previously was postponed from mid-March because of a hailstorm that damaged the insulating foam on the shuttle's external tank. (This version CORRECTS that biological canisters will be deposited during next week's spacewalk.) Full Coverage: International Space Station Astronauts start 3rd spacewalk AP 08 Solar storm disrupts spacecraft at BBC, Dec 18 Crew may do extra ISS spacewalk at BBC, Dec 14 Spacewalkers begin station's electrical upgrade at Houston Chronicle, Dec 13 Life in outer space poses otherworldly challenges at Boston Globe, Jan 18 For Iranian native, trip to space her lifelong dream at USATODAY.com, Sep 01 Pawning NASA's Crown Jewels at Scientific American, Feb 08 People the world over wish upon the same stars at Amarillo Globe-News., May 13 whales provide new information Panda that was released into wild dies Ban on selling wildlife may fuel trade Nine Atlantic hurricanes expected in &#39;07 World&#39;s only human-bred panda in wild dies Finger length may foretell academic potential Who Sleeps Around? Scientists Know Scientists seek approval to kill sharks Shields Up! Cosmonauts Install Protective Space Station Panels Weather & Science Video AccuWeather minutes ago Elliot&#39;s Elaboration - Elliot Abrams AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Friday AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Thursday AccuWeather minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. this image from NASA Television, Cosmonauts Oleg Kotov, left, flight engineer on the International... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Rare rhino death leaves only 13 worldwide Wayward whales closing in on Golden Gate Sci-fi writers join war on terror SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_sc/delta_whales Calif. whales provide new information whales provide new information By MARCUS WOHLSEN, AM ET SAN FRANCISCO - Scientists observing the wayward wanderings of two humpback whales in a California river have more to celebrate than their return to the Pacific Ocean &#151; the duo provided an unexpected opportunity to study the endangered species. The information scientists gathered includes sound recordings, logs of their behavior and tissue samples from both the mother and calf, which will be analyzed to determine whether they come from a pod of whales that travel between Mexico and California. "All those things are very hard to get. So what we are doing is filling up the knowledge bank on humpback whales in the wild," said Jim Oswald, a spokesman for the nonprofit Marine Mammal Center, a private scientific and rescue organization. The experience also could prove helpful in approaching other stranded whales, he said. After spending more than two weeks trying to coax the whales back to sea with mixed results, officials were ready Wednesday to declare Operation Humpback a success. Since the previously conspicuous whales had not been seen for a full day, officials assumed the duo found their way home, undoing a wrong turn that inspired a range of rescue attempts. The whales, believed to be a mother and calf, were last observed at sunset Tuesday swimming in San Francisco Bay about 10 miles north of the city. A convoy of boats that accompanied the whales across the bay to keep traffic at a distance stopped escorting them when it got dark. Officials think the whales slipped out of San Francisco Bay to the open sea late Tuesday night or early Wednesday morning, when no one was watching. To make sure the whales did not take another wrong turn, two government boats were launched Wednesday morning to look for them in the Pacific Ocean. Rescuers relied on reports from commercial vessels and Coast Guard patrols to determine if the humpbacks still were in the bay. Officials said they will never know why the humpbacks swam 90 miles inland. But their journey marks the first time the same humpbacks were studied in the wild for so long, according to Bernadette Fees, deputy director of the California Department of Fish and Game. It also was the first time that whales swimming free in the wild were successfully treated with antibiotics. The pair apparently were injured by a boat at some point, and officials said their wounds might have played a role in their becoming stranded in the fresh water of the Sacramento-San Joaquin River Delta. Based on the way their skin deteriorated while they were in the delta, marine scientists now have a clearer idea of how long whales can survive in fresh water, Gulland said. After the whales were spotted near Sacramento on May 13, officials spent days trying to goad them back to the ocean, playing recordings of other whales, surrounding them with boats, blasting them with fire hoses and banging metal pipes dangling beneath the water. Those involved in the rescue effort said they did not know if the methods hastened the whales' exit or hindered it. They tried to strike a balance between getting the whales going and not making the problem worse. "What we ultimately came away with is that many of the techniques had some effect, but none of them could make a whale go in a direction it did not want to go," said John Calambokidis, a scientist with the nonprofit Cascadia Research Collective. Officials speculated Wednesday that antibiotics given to the whales on Saturday to try to heal their wounds may have been a factor in their departure. The pair began their hasty retreat from the delta after receiving them. Biologists said the saltier water where the mother humpback whale and her calf had been swimming since leaving the delta helped reverse some of the health problems caused by long exposure to fresh water. Gulland said she would not be ready to celebrate until Sunday, when she could be more certain the humpbacks were safely on their way. Officials were unsure how much was spent on the rescue efforts, but they insisted the expenditures of time and money were justified, if not required under wildlife protection laws. They urged people who were captivated by the whales and followed their progress to transfer their energy to protecting marine habitats. Associated Press writer Lisa Leff in Vallejo contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Whales and Dolphins Whaling commission meeting faces another row on final day AFP, 7 minutes ago Japan argues to hunt minke whales AP, AM ET Cultural claim to whale hunting at BBC, May 29 Public thinks big, small in rescue effort at Contra Costa Times., May 27 Whale sanctuary proposal defeated at BBC, May 30 Japan's whale cull offer rejected at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Save the whales at sea, too at San Francisco Chronicle, May 20 Whales getting attention as Delta smelt vanish at Sacramento Bee, May 20 station gets protective shielding Panda that was released into wild dies Ban on selling wildlife may fuel trade Nine Atlantic hurricanes expected in &#39;07 World&#39;s only human-bred panda in wild dies Finger length may foretell academic potential Who Sleeps Around? Scientists Know Space station gets protective shielding Scientists seek approval to kill sharks Weather & Science Video AccuWeather minutes ago Elliot&#39;s Elaboration - Elliot Abrams AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Friday AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Thursday AccuWeather minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. A Coast Guard boat patrols the water in the San Francisco bay, Wednesday, May 30,... Wayward whales make progress in Calif. Wayward Whales May Have Already Slipped Out To Sea The two wayward whales have not been seen since Tuesday night. But many have been gathering near the Golden Gate, hoping for one last look. Anna Duckworth reports. &raquo; More CBS 5 San Francisco video Whales may have slipped back into Pacific Two lost whales seen just before sunset nearing their ocean home after a two-week sojourn through inland waterways may have quietly returned to their ocean home. (May 30) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Rare rhino death leaves only 13 worldwide Wayward whales closing in on Golden Gate Sci-fi writers join war on terror SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/activist_s_son_arrested PM ET SPRINGFIELD, Ohio - The son of a man who became a national crusader for tougher sex-offender laws after his 9-year-old daughter was kidnapped, raped and killed has been accused of sexual conduct with a minor, authorities said. Joshua Lunsford, 18, son of Mark Lunsford, was arrested May 18 after a woman accused him of fondling her 14-year-old daughter twice, at a skating rink and outside a shopping mall, according to police. He has pleaded not guilty to the felony charge. Mark Lunsford's daughter, Jessica, was kidnapped from the bedroom of her Florida home in February 2005, raped and buried alive. The exact family relationship between Joshua and Jessica was unclear Wednesday night. After his daughter was killed, Mark Lunsford traveled the country, testifying before state legislators on bills that would toughen laws against sex offenders that prey on young children. More than a dozen states have passed versions of Jessica's Law. The girl Joshua Lunsford is accused of fondling was a willing participant in the contact in March, according to a statement by the girl's mother to the German Township Police Department. Ohio law prohibits anyone 18 or older from having sexual contact with anyone younger than 16. Mark Lunsford, of Homosassa Springs, Fla., told The Tampa Tribune it has not been proven that his son has done anything wrong. Even what has been alleged cannot compared with the crimes of the pedophiles he has helped put in prison through his work with the Jessica Marie Lunsford Foundation, he said. "We're talking about Romeo and Juliet here, not some 36-year-old pervert following around a 10-year-old," Lunsford said. Attorney Mark Gelman, who was a liaison between the Lunsfords and authorities during the investigation into the death of Jessica Lunsford, said Mark Lunsford was not Joshua's custodial parent. "I've always heard that Josh is a good kid. I would just tell people not to jump to any conclusions," Gelman said. A woman who answered the phone at Joshua Lunsford's home Wednesday said he had no comment. A message seeking comment was left for Mark Lunsford. John Evander Couey, who lived in a mobile home 150 yards from the Lunsford home, was convicted of killing Jessica Lunsford in March, and a jury has recommended the death penalty. vet faces hearing over protest Calif. whales leave behind information - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/civil_unions BEVERLEY WANG, N.H. - Gay couples in New Hampshire can start applying for many of the rights and responsibilities of marriage as early as January under a law Gov. John Lynch signed Thursday establishing civil unions. "We in New Hampshire have had a long and proud tradition taking the lead in opposing discrimination," Lynch said. "Today that tradition continues." Couples who enter civil unions will have the same rights, responsibilities and obligations as married couples. Same-sex unions from other states also would be recognized if they were legal in the state where they were performed. Legislators who gathered for the bill signing packed the governor's chambers and overflowed into an adjoining sitting room. They snapped photos and burst into applause as he signed it. "I've listened and I've heard all the arguments," said Lynch, a Democrat. "I do not believe that this bill threatens marriage. I believe that this is a matter of conscience and fairness." Episcopal Bishop V. Gene Robinson was among those attending. Although his consecration in 2003 as the first openly gay bishop in the Episcopal Church divided the worldwide Anglican Communion to which it belongs, Robinson and his longtime partner plan to take advantage of civil unions. "This is not a radical departure," Robinson said of the bill. "This is a real confirmation of what New Hampshire has always been about: the freedom of its own citizens and fairness for everyone." Robinson said he will not direct Episcopal priests in the state to bless same-sex unions, letting priests decide that individually. Such blessings have been another divisive issue for Episcopalians and the Anglican union. "That authority belongs to them and I would not in any way ask them not to do that. ... Just like in marriages, every priest will have the option to bless or not to bless," Robinson said. Massachusetts alone among the U.S. states allows gay marriage. Connecticut, Vermont, New Jersey, Maine, California and Washington allow either civil unions or domestic partnerships, and Oregon will join the list with New Hampshire in January. Hawaii extends certain spousal rights to same-sex couples and cohabiting heterosexual pairs. (This version CORRECTS name to Anglican Communion.) Full Coverage: Gay & Lesbian Issues Washington urges tolerance in TV spot AP Ban kept for gay men donating blood AP NY couples celebrate gay marriage ruling AP Anglican church turmoil over gay issues deepens Reuters at TIME Magazine, Feb 22 In N.J., getting an early start on civil unions at Philadelphia Inquirer (reg req'd), Feb 20 at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 14 Recognition of gay couples spreads at Toronto Star (reg req'd), Apr 24 vet faces hearing over protest - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Porrero, the owner of a wedding shop that bills itself as Europe's first to... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Gay & Lesbian Issues &raquo; More News Feeds
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/official_sex_change Fired transsexual not picked for new job transsexual not picked for new job By PHIL DAVIS, PM ET SARASOTA, Fla. - Steve Stanton was fired as city manager in Largo two months ago after announcing his plans to become Susan Stanton. On Wednesday, Stanton, wearing a white skirt, pumps and makeup, applied for the top job in this cosmopolitan tourist town, and was turned down. The Sarasota city commissioners instead picked another one of the five candidates. Stanton was their third choice. "It's just too soon. It's too soon for a transgendered city manager. ... I just don't think the world is ready just yet," the 48-year-old Stanton said as she made a hasty exit from City Hall. Commissioner Ken Shelin disagreed. Shelin said the determining factor was the winning candidate's "quiet leadership." Stanton "made it into the top three," Shelin said. "She got serious consideration. She made, clearly, a very strong impression on all of us. There were favorable comments from all the commissioners." Earlier this year, the Largo City Commission voted 5-2 to fire Stanton from the $140,000-a-year job after 14 years of generally excellent evaluations. Hundreds of people for and against transsexual rights packed the chambers, and dozens of police officers were posted to keep the peace. In the end, commissioners said it was Stanton's judgment and honesty, not his impending sex change, that prompted their decision. Things were much calmer in Sarasota, about 50 miles south of Largo on Florida's southwestern coast. Largo, with a population of 76,000, is a working-class community in the Tampa Bay area. Sarasota's 54,000 residents are generally more affluent, and it has a thriving arts scene. Sarasota is the home of New College of Florida, where the 750 students take classes without grades and design their own curriculum. The city is also home to the John and Mable Ringling Museum of Art, which has a collection of Old Masters bought by the circus tycoon. Sarasota is also where Stanton spent much of her secret life as Susan before going public, spending several weekends a year there dressed in women's clothing. "We need to put a little pepper in the atmosphere," said Sarasota resident Gwen Calloway, 70, who supported Stanton. "She has the background. She can start running instead of walking. She has proved she's accomplished." The five candidates for city manager were interviewed separately at an open meeting, during which no one spoke against Stanton. A few police officers watched over the few citizens who sat through the job interviews. The commissioners hesitated to bring up the one topic on nearly everyone's mind &#151; Stanton's plans to undergo sex change surgery someday soon and complete the process started when Stanton recently began living as a woman. So Stanton brought it up. Stanton said that having a transsexual city manager would not be as disruptive as they might think. She said that the recuperation time for a sex change operation is minimal and that, if hired, she would step back from the national spotlight. "It's a legitimate concern and hopefully I've addressed it," Stanton, who has started hormone therapy, said in her somewhat deep voice before the vote. "I have taken the initiative to throw it out and maybe remove it from the table." The five commissioners ultimately voted to hire Robert Bartolotta, 59, who resigned as city manager of Jupiter in 2004 to care for his terminally ill wife. She has since died. Their second choice was Marsha Segal-George, 54, a deputy chief administrator in Orlando. Stanton said before the vote that she did not believe the sex change would be a factor in the city's decision. And she said many residents stopped her to express support as she explored the city in the days leading up to Wednesday's vote. "Not a single person has focused on what I wear, the type of shoes I have on or the type of necklace I am wearing. It's just not an issue," Stanton said before the vote. Stanton, the father of a teenage son, said the intense media scrutiny made the Sarasota interview cumbersome. A scrum of cameras and reporters made her easy to spot at a crowded Tuesday night reception for the candidates. A photographer followed her to the threshold of the women's restroom. The scrutiny is "part of the price of admission," Stanton said before the vote. "The job of a city manager, while critical, is extremely uninteresting," she added. "I am pretty confident that within two or three weeks the media is going to find something that is a real story. But not this. This is silly." vet faces hearing over protest - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/tuberculosis_infection_analysis MIKE STOBBE, AP Medical Writer 2 hours, 17 minutes ago on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. "We always think of planes as a vehicle for spreading disease," said Dr. Doug Hardy, an infectious disease specialist at UT Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas. In the latest case, a Georgia man with extensively drug-resistant TB ignored doctors' advice and took two trans-Atlantic flights, leading to the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963. The man, who officials did not identify, had been quarantined at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital until Thursday morning, when he was transferred to Denver's National Jewish Hospital for treatment, Jewish Hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. He walked into the building and said he felt fine, Allstetter said. The hospital has treated two other patients with what appears to be the same strain of tuberculosis since 2000 and both improved enough to be released, according to Dr. Charles Daley, head of the infectious disease division at National Jewish. "I think we're more optimistic than what we have been hearing in reports that we will be able to control this infection," Daley told CNN Thursday morning. "We're aiming for cure. We know it's an uphill battle." The patient was not considered highly contagious, and there are no confirmed reports that his illness spread to other passengers. But the case illustrates ongoing concerns about the public health perils of plane travel, as well as the continuing problem of Typhoid Mary-like individuals who can almost be counted on to do the wrong thing. The man decided to proceed with a long-planned wedding trip despite being advised not to fly. "There's always going to be situations where there is a lack of understanding and appreciation of responsibility to the community in a situation like this," said Dr. John Ho, an infectious diseases specialist at New York-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell Medical Center. The case also points out weaknesses in the system: The man was able to re-enter the United States, even though he said he had been warned by federal officials that his passport was being flagged and he was being placed on a no-fly list. officials said they contacted the Department of to put the man on a no-fly list, but it doesn't appear he was added by the time he flew from Prague to Montreal and drove across the border from Canada. A Transportation Security Administration spokesman could not be reached for comment Wednesday. Challenges in coordinating with airlines and in communicating with the media also have emerged, said Glen Nowak, a spokesman for the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. "This clearly is going to have some relevance to our pandemic influenza preparedness," Nowak said. There have been several prominent disease-on-a-plane incidents in recent years. Perhaps best known is severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, which erupted in Asia in 2003. Over three months, CDC workers delayed on the tarmac 12,000 airplanes carrying 3 million passengers arriving from SARS-affected countries, isolating people with SARS symptoms. Last year, CDC officials worked with airlines and state health departments to track two infected airline passengers who may have helped spread a mumps epidemic throughout the Midwest. And in March, a flight from Hong Kong was held at Newark International Airport for two hours because some on board reported feeling ill from a flu-like illness. They were released when it became clear they had seasonal flu, and not an avian variety. Medical experts say TB is significantly less contagious than flu, SARS and other maladies that have led to airport alerts. "This is not as easily transmissible as what we're concerned about with a flu pandemic," said Dr. William Schaffner, chairman of the department of preventive medicine at Vanderbilt University. A more contagious bug, carried by a stubborn or evasive passenger, could be much more problematic, experts said. It's remarkable how rarely serious contagions are on planes, Ho noted. "If you count the number of international flights there are on a daily basis, this is really a minuscule event" in terms of rate of occurrence, he said. "However, this underscores the interrelatedness of the global community. We can no longer escape things considered foreign" in this age of jet-travel, Ho said. Associated Press writer Malcolm Ritter in New York contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare TB patient in Denver for treatment AP US probes how TB traveler crossed border AP Man knew he had TB before flying to Europe at CNN.com, May 30 Tuberculosis - Getting the Facts at FOX News, May 31 Upset air travelers criticize CDC on TB alert at Atlanta Journal-Constitution, May 30 vet faces hearing over protest Martin Cetron, Director, Division of Global Migration and Quarantine, CDC, during a news conference... Passengers Onboard With TB Carrier Angry Travelers on flight with tuberculosis patient are furious man put them at risk. &raquo; More ABC News video Could one tuberculosis patient infect an entire airline flight? &raquo; More ABC News video &raquo; Show all news video headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/military_protest_hearing Marine vet faces hearing over protest vet faces hearing over protest 1 hour, 40 minutes ago KANSAS CITY, Mo. - An war veteran could lose his honorable discharge status after being photographed wearing fatigues at an anti-war protest. Marine Cpl. Adam Kokesh and other veterans marked the fourth anniversary of the war in Iraq in March by wearing their uniforms &#151; with military insignia removed &#151; and roaming around the nation's capital on a mock patrol. After Kokesh was identified in a photo cutline in The Washington Post, a superior officer sent him a letter saying he might have violated a rule prohibiting troops from wearing uniforms without authorization. Kokesh, a member of Iraq Veterans Against the War, responded with an obscenity. Now, a military panel has been scheduled to meet with Kokesh on Monday to decide whether his discharge status should be changed from "honorable" to "other than honorable." "This is clearly a case of selective prosecution and intimidation of veterans who speak out against the war," Kokesh said. "To suggest that while as a veteran you don't have freedom of speech is absurd." Kokesh is part of the Individual Ready Reserve, a segment of the reserves that consists mainly of those who have left active duty but still have time remaining on their eight-year military obligations. His attorney, Mike Lebowitz, said Kokesh's IRR status ends June 18. He said at least three other veterans have been investigated because of their involvement at demonstrations. Kokesh, 25, enlisted in the Marines while still attending high school in New Mexico. He was a reservist in an artillery unit, assigned to the November Battery, 5th Battalion, 14th Regiment of the 4th Division based out of Pico Rivera, Calif., near Los Angeles. Kokesh said he had reservations about Iraq even before the United States invaded, but wanted to go there to help rebuild schools and mosques after 's regime was toppled. He even learned Arabic. He said he grew disillusioned with the war during his first tour, and now believes there is no way for the country to achieve the rule of law with a foreign military imposing martial law. He was supposed to go to Iraq a second time, but was demoted from sergeant to corporal and not allowed to return after it was learned that he brought a pistol back after his first tour in 2004. Kokesh argues that he was not representing the military at the protest in Washington, and he made that clear by removing his name tag and other military insignia from his uniform. Lebowitz said Kokesh technically is a civilian unless recalled to active duty and had the right to be disrespectful in his response to the officer. He called the proceedings against Kokesh highly unusual and said the military usually seeks to change a veteran's discharge status only if a crime has been committed. If his discharge status is changed, Kokesh said he could lose some health benefits and be forced to repay about $10,800 he received to obtain his undergraduate degree on the GI Bill. Kokesh said he holds no ill will toward the Marines. "I love the Marine Corps," he said. "I always have loved the Marine Corps, and that is why I'm particularly offended to see it being used for political ends." (This version CORRECTS date of protest to March sted April.) whales leave behind information with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/nagin_state_of_city Nagin: New Orleans is a city on the mend New Orleans is a city on the mend By BECKY BOHRER, AM ET NEW ORLEANS - Mayor Ray Nagin, in his first State of the City address since Hurricane Katrina, said Wednesday that New Orleans is a city on the mend, despite broken promises from the state and federal governments. "New Orleans is coming back, whether you like it or not," Nagin said to applause from the crowd of city workers and community members gathered at the National World War II Museum. "And you might as well deal with it." and Gov. Kathleen Blanco to do more to help speed the city's recovery from the August 2005 storm. He said Bush has failed to move federal aid to "the people who need it the most," and said he should forgive millions of dollars in disaster loans that the city took out after the storm to help it to continue operating. He also called on Blanco to use a budget surplus to help the city. "Use the $3 billion budget surplus to ensure a strong future for our state and for all our citizens," Nagin said. "Because as New Orleans recovers, and as south Louisiana recovers, so does Louisiana." A message seeking comment was left with a spokesperson for Blanco. A White House spokeswoman said the city, not the federal government, must be the force behind the recovery effort. "The federal government has committed more than $110 billion to help the Gulf Coast recover, and we will continue to provide assistance. But the people of the Gulf Coast and their elected leaders must drive the effort to rebuild their lives and their communities," said Jeanie Mamo, a spokeswoman for the White House. Nagin referred to the city's challenges, including a storm-depleted police force dealing with a rise in violent crime and a health care system in "crisis," but he also touted what he deemed successes, from the cleanup of the French Quarter to the return of more than half the city's pre-Katrina population of 455,000. He compared his city to a patient written off as dying who eventually recovered. "We have stabilized. We are implementing plans for our future, and we are strong enough for the next phase of recovery _the transformation to the new New Orleans," Nagin said. The speech comes just two days before the start of a new hurricane season, and against the backdrop of a city still fighting to recover from a storm 21 months ago. Swaths of some neighborhoods remain in shambles, with houses empty and many small businesses ailing or shuttered. Police still work out of trailers. As of mid-month, the city said it had received just $163 million in federal rebuilding aid, a fraction of the $1 billion or more it says it will need just to restore what Katrina damaged and with little earmarked for permanent infrastructure work. Nagin asked residents &#151; those in the city and still displaced &#151; to not lose heart. He said he, too, has dealt with feelings of frustration and despair and with rebuilding challenges such as a new roof leaking that very morning. "Don't give up. Don't give up on us," he said against cheers and applause. "We will be back. The city of New Orleans will be back." - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Orleans Mayor Ray Nagin gives his state of the city address at the National... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Hurricanes and Tropical Storms &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/ticket_scalping Ticket scalping comes out of the shadows scalping comes out of the shadows By DAVID B. CARUSO, AM ET NEW YORK - The days of seeking out ticket-scalpers in the shadows, ducking into alleys and dodging police for that elusive Yankees-Red Sox seat are fading fast. New York is poised this week to become the latest state to ease or eliminate decades-old restrictions on scalping. For the first time, it would become entirely legal in the state for average fans to scalp their seats on the Internet. And, for better or worse, they could sell those tickets at what ever price the market is willing to bear. The state assembly approved the changes Tuesday. The Senate is expected to follow suit, and Gov. Eliot Spitzer could sign the measure by Friday, when the state's old anti-scalping law expires. "If you have something to sell, you should be able to sell it for what it is truly worth," said Sean Pate, spokesman for the online ticket broker StubHub Inc., which lobbied hard for the change. Some old regulations would stay in place. Scalpers would still be banned from selling tickets within 1,500 feet of large arenas, like Madison Square Garden and Yankee Stadium, and within 500 feet of smaller venues. Large-volume brokers would still need to get a license, too. It's those brokers who have Russ Haven of the New York Public Interest Research Group worried. Haven argues that lifting the price caps will only prompt greedy opportunists to snap up every available seat, and then jack up prices. "I think this is a bum deal for consumers," Haven said. "As it is, seats to popular events are often selling for 10 times their face price." "It may be that there will be some portion of tickets that go for less than face value, but that's not what they're all banking on," he said of the brokers and ticket agencies pushing for change. Other states have also reconsidered anti-scalping laws. Minnesota tossed its old anti-scalping laws this spring. The state previously allowed tickets to be resold only at face value. A bill that would ease Missouri's ban on selling tickets to sporting events at more than face value passed the legislature and is now before the governor. Illinois and Florida also recently did away with old anti-scalping rules, and bills to ease restrictions are under discussion in Massachusetts and Connecticut. The shift has been propelled in part by the explosion of Internet ticket sales that has made it nearly impossible for states to enforce price caps. New York's old rule limiting a seller's profits to no more than 45 percent over face value has been widely ignored online. But perhaps the biggest change was a switch in business strategy by some of the sports and entertainment companies that previously fought scalping the hardest: Realizing that a multibillion-dollar market was being left untapped, a growing number of teams and theaters have been entering the secondary ticket market themselves. signed a deal last year to resell tournament tickets through RazorGator.com. The NBA and some NFL teams have made Ticketmaster their official reseller under an agreement that gives teams a percentage of the profit when a seat is resold. "There is obviously a business opportunity here for us," said Ticketmaster vice president Joseph Freeman. Yet to be seen is how much control sports teams, theaters and concert halls will retain over the tickets being resold. Some have pushed for legislation that would limit reselling to venue-approved brokerages, in part to cut down on the possibility of fraud. Both the New York Yankees and their archrival Boston Red Sox recently made a practice of cracking down on season ticket holders caught selling their unwanted seats on the Internet, in violation of team policy. New York's new rules, if signed in their current form, would actually ban New York sports teams from taking such punitive action. "My feeling is, if I have a ticket, and I can't go to a ballgame, I should certainly have a right to give it to my brother or my cousin &#151; and if they want to pay me for it, why should I have to go through the Yankees to do it?" state Sen. Dean G. Skelos said. vet faces hearing over protest with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Nina Tamminam, visiting from Tampere, Finland, who was first in line, displays the tickets she... Get an alert when there are new stories about:
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/mob_indictment Reputed New York mob boss is charged New York mob boss is charged By LARRY NEUMEISTER, AM ET NEW YORK - The reputed head of the Genovese crime family was charged Wednesday with extortion and loansharking as the federal government began a fresh crackdown on what it describes as the most dangerous of the city's five organized crime families. Danny Leo, alias "The Lion," was held without bail after he was arrested on charges of conspiring with others to extort the owner of a livery car business and an illegal gambling business from 2002 until last November. The government can prove at trial that Leo is "the current boss of the Genovese crime family, perhaps the largest and most violent crime family that exists," Assistant U.S. Attorney Eric Snyder said. As the family's boss, Leo commanded more than 200 members, prosecutors say. Snyder said the government expected to rewrite the four-page indictment to charge Leo, 65, with racketeering. He said the evidence included proof gathered by a cooperating witness and by a victim who agreed to wear a microphone to record conversations. The charges are unsubstantiated, said Leo's lawyer, Peter Tsapatsaris. He argued that his client should be freed on bail or limited to home detention because he had only one arrest in his background &#151; in 1980. However, U.S. District Judge Lewis A. Kaplan ordered Leo held without bail after concluding that he was a danger to the community and a threat to engage in or to direct violence. The indictment accused Leo of threatening the livery car business owner with physical harm if he did not promptly repay loans. It also accused him of threatening to harm two brothers who owned an illegal gambling business in East Harlem if they did not repay loans. Leo could face up to 20 years in prison if convicted. - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/slavery_apology PHILLIP RAWLS, hour, 41 minutes ago MONTGOMERY, Ala. - Gov. Bob Riley signed a resolution Thursday expressing "profound regret" for Alabama's role in slavery and apologizing for slavery's wrongs and lingering effects. "Slavery was evil and is a part of American history," the Republican governor said. "I believe all Alabamians are proud of the tremendous progress we have made and continue to make." Alabama is the fourth Southern state to pass a slavery apology, following votes by the legislatures in Maryland, Virginia and North Carolina. Alabama's Democrat-controlled Legislature approved the resolution last week. The Alabama resolution describes "centuries of brutal dehumanization and injustices" and says "the vestiges of slavery are ever before African-American citizens." It also says the House and Senate "express our profound regret for the State of Alabama's role in slavery and that we apologize for the wrongs inflicted by slavery and its after effects in the United States of America." "This proves Alabama is open for everyone and we are ready to improve race relations," said state Rep. Mary Moore, a Birmingham Democrat who sponsored the resolution. "The issue of slavery and its impact on the country had been kept in the closet until a few Southern states said, 'We want to take it out of the closet.'" vet faces hearing over protest - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/718 The top U.S. national news headlines from - The tuberculosis patient under the first federal quarantine since 1963 is a 31-year-old personal injury attorney who practices law with his father in Atlanta, a federal law enforcement official said Thursday. Czech officials seek passengers exposed to TB hour, 41 minutes ago hours, 42 minutes ago and posts clips online. A new study suggests a link between some cancers and power lines. 60 MINUTES ON YAHOO! NEWS Two years in Iraq The story of one battalion and their families at home. UNDERGROUND ON YAHOO! NEWS Venice Beach's graffiti walls are the fastest in the West. hours, 17 minutes ago ATLANTA - SARS on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. Spain files claim over treasure ship TAMPA, Fla. - The Spanish government has filed claims in U.S. federal court over a shipwreck that a Florida firm found laden with colonial-era treasure, an attorney said Thursday. Ticket scalping comes out of the shadows AM ET NEW YORK - The days of seeking out ticket-scalpers in the shadows, ducking into alleys and dodging police for that elusive Yankees-Red Sox seat are fading fast. Calif. whales provide new information AM ET SAN FRANCISCO - Scientists observing the wayward wanderings of two humpback whales in a California river have more to celebrate than their return to the Pacific Ocean &#151; the duo provided an unexpected opportunity to study the endangered species. Marine vet faces hearing over protest 1 hour, 40 minutes ago KANSAS CITY, Mo. - An Iraq war veteran could lose his honorable discharge status after being photographed wearing fatigues at an anti-war protest. Listener helps save ailing disc jockey 2 hours, 24 minutes ago SHELBY, N.C. - A radio listener helped save a disc jockey who suffered an on-air seizure and pleaded for help before passing out in his studio. ACLU: Boeing offshoot helped CIA AM ET NEW YORK - A Boeing Co. subsidiary accused by the American Civil Liberties Union of facilitating torture by providing services to the CIA for secret overseas flights said it does not, as a rule, inquire about its customers' business. NY teens ready to gauge air pollution AM ET NEW YORK - Teenagers from a Brooklyn neighborhood surrounded by power plants, a waste-transfer station and a busy expressway will soon take to the streets to monitor the pollutants residents are breathing. Top spellers move to bee's final rounds PM ET WASHINGTON - For most kids, the appearance of the word "Bewusstseinslage" on any kind of test would be reason to shriek in horror. For Matthew Evans, it was cause for joy. Reputed New York mob boss is charged AM ET NEW YORK - The reputed head of the Genovese crime family was charged Wednesday with extortion and loansharking as the federal government began a fresh crackdown on what it describes as the most dangerous of the city's five organized crime families. Nagin: New Orleans is a city on the mend AM ET NEW ORLEANS - Mayor Ray Nagin, in his first State of the City address since Hurricane Katrina, said Wednesday that New Orleans is a city on the mend, despite broken promises from the state and federal governments. Marine describes Haditha death scene PM ET CAMP PENDLETON, Calif. - An officer who saw the corpses of Iraqi women and children sprawled across a bed in a home said Wednesday in recorded testimony that he believed that "my Marines were doing the right thing" when they killed them. PM ET SPRINGFIELD, Ohio - The son of a man who became a national crusader for tougher sex-offender laws after his 9-year-old daughter was kidnapped, raped and killed has been accused of sexual conduct with a minor, authorities said. Space station gets protective shielding PM ET CAPE CANAVERAL, Fla. - Two Russian cosmonauts climbed out of the international space station Wednesday to install protective panels designed to shield the orbiting outpost from dangerous space debris. Fired transsexual not picked for new job PM ET SARASOTA, Fla. - Steve Stanton was fired as city manager in Largo two months ago after announcing his plans to become Susan Stanton. On Wednesday, Stanton, wearing a white skirt, pumps and makeup, applied for the top job in this cosmopolitan tourist town, and was turned down. Crimes and Trials News Condemned woman seeks reprieve based on new ways of analyzing baby&#39;s death PM ET A Texas babysitter facing execution for killing an infant in her care says new scientific evidence supports her claim that she accidentally dropped the child and did not intentionally kill him, as prosecutors alleged in her trial. Actress&#39;s death in Spector home was homicide, medical examiner says PM ET LOS ANGELES (C ourt TV) - A medical examiner said Tuesday that the actress slain in Phil Spector&#39;s mansion was a victim of homicide, not suicide, contradicting defense claims that she died of a self-inflicted gunshot wound. Misstep in Spector case could haunt renowned forensic scientist for cases to come Fri May 25, 3:11 PM ET LOS ANGELES (C ourt TV) - On the lower portion of Dr. Henry Lee&#39;s Web site, under a link to his 85-page curriculum vitae and adjacent to a list of his five honorary Ph.D. degrees, is a section entitled "The Winner&#39;s Attitude." Spector defense targets forensic errors PM ET LOS ANGELES - A coroner who concluded that Lana Clarkson's death was a homicide testified Wednesday in Phil Spector's murder trial that he cannot tell from autopsy results whether the actress was holding the gun that killed her. "Ganja guru" convicted in San Francisco retrial PM ET SAN FRANCISCO (Reuters) - After fighting for years to clear his name, a prominent marijuana advocate known as the "ganja guru" was convicted again on Wednesday on charges of cultivating and distributing the weed. The Supreme Court rules in a key sex discrimination case. CNN&#39;s Lisa Sylvester reports. (May 31) &raquo; More CNN video of the Top 10 spammers in the world was arrested by federal authorities. &raquo; More ABC News video tuberculosis patient with a rare and dangerous form of the disease arrived at Denver&#39;s National Jewish Medical and Research Center for treatment Thursday, telling hospital officials he felt fine. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video &raquo; More from Y! Finance All Full Coverage President George W. Bush looks at the media after arriving back at the White House... Mother, 4 children found hanged in Texas Utah liquor store tries to keep up with demand Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (Learn about My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_fe_st/odd_disc_jockey_rescue Listener helps save ailing disc jockey helps save ailing disc jockey 2 hours, 24 minutes ago SHELBY, N.C. - A radio listener helped save a disc jockey who suffered an on-air seizure and pleaded for help before passing out in his studio. WOHS DJ Tim Biggerstaff, who has suffered from diabetes since childhood, has always been candid about his health. When he felt a seizure about to strike Monday, he called out to his listeners. Gerald Weathers heard the plea and raced to the nearby studio. Since Biggerstaff was the only person working on the holiday, officials contacted another WOHS radio employee to unlock the door. Biggerstaff was found unconscious inside. "It's quite frankly a bloody miracle that I am here at all," said Biggerstaff, 46. This isn't the first time a listener has saved the DJ's life. Three years ago, a listener donated a kidney to him when he needed a transplant. Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Amputee uses crutch to fight off gunmen Most Viewed: Odd News Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Indian lawyers tie man to tree, beat him Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Odd News - Video Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Mail Delivered: Rain, Sleet, or Zero Gravity? AM ET Will You E-Marry Me? May 29, 11:32 PM ET Leapin&#39; Lizards: Reptile on the Loose May 29, 10:36 PM ET answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit the latest news, photos and video of the funky, and weird. &raquo; More at CNN.com Latest news on the strange, quirky and just plain odd. &raquo; More at USATODAY.com
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/airman_shooting Airman testifies about deputy shooting - Yahoo! News Airman testifies about deputy shooting By GILLIAN FLACCUS, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 43 minutes ago SAN BERNARDINO, Calif. - An war veteran testified Monday that a deputy ordered him to get up from the ground twice during a videotaped confrontation after a car chase and then shot him three times when he tried to comply. Senior Airman Elio Carrion said the deputy swore repeatedly at him as he tried to explain that he was in the military and was not a threat as he lay near the passenger-side door. "I said, 'I'm in the military, I'm in the (expletive) military. Believe me, we mean you no harm,'" Carrion testified. "And the officer says, 'OK, get up' and I repeat that I'm going to get up, and as I get up, he shoots me." Former San Bernadino Sheriff's Deputy Ivory J. Webb Jr., 46, has pleaded not guilty to felony charges of voluntary attempted manslaughter and assault with a firearm. If convicted, he could face more than 18 years in prison. Deputy District Attorney Lewis Cope replayed an amateur video of the Jan. 29, 2006, shooting recorded by a bystander and broadcast on TV stations nationwide. Carrion, 23, showed no emotion as he watched the footage that showed him being shot in the chest, left leg and left shoulder. His relatives in the audience appeared to struggle to hold back tears. Webb's lawyer said during the trial's opening statements that Webb may have told Carrion, "Don't get up!" He also said that just seconds before the gunfire, Carrion's hand moved toward his jacket pocket &#151; something police often believe means a suspect is going for a weapon. Authorities later determined Carrion was unarmed. Carrion testified that Webb never told him to stay on the ground. He said that in the minutes after the shooting, he thought he was going to die and struggled to stay conscious. The video shows him face-down on the street and his hands cuffed behind him, as more police cars arrive. He recalled asking other deputies why Webb had shot him. "There was one time when someone asked me if I was OK. I said 'yeah.' I said, I believe, 'Why did he shoot me? He told me to get up and he shot me three times,'" Carrion testified. Carrion did not remember if the person replied. "At the time, I thought if I close my eyes or if I see black, I don't know if I'll wake up next time," he said. Carrion testified earlier that he began the night at a barbecue held in his honor as he prepared to return to his base in Louisiana after a 30-day leave from Iraq. Carrion and Luis Escobedo left the party in a friend's 2004 blue Corvette. Both had been drinking, and soon a deputy was in pursuit as the Corvette reached speeds of 100 mph. Carrion said he begged his friend to pull over after noticing a patrol car behind them. Escobedo lost control of the 2004 blue Corvette, crashed into a concrete wall, went into a spin and ended up hood-to-hood with Webb's patrol car, Carrion said. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/missouri_executions Yahoo! News JIM SALTER, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 24 minutes ago ST. LOUIS - A federal appeals court opened the way for Missouri to resume executing inmates, ruling Monday that the state's lethal injection procedure is not cruel and unusual punishment. The case filed on behalf of condemned killer Michael Taylor had effectively halted Missouri executions since early last year. A judge said he wanted to be sure that the three-drug injection method did not cause risk of pain and suffering. A three-judge panel of the 8th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals found "no evidence to indicate that any of the last six inmates executed suffered any unnecessary pain," according to its ruling. The court's decision reversed a ruling by U.S. District Judge Fernando Gaitan Jr. ordering reforms to Missouri's lethal injection procedures. He wanted the state to involve a doctor specializing in anesthesia, but the state has been unable to find a doctor willing to participate. Missouri is among nine states that have put executions on hold as it grapples with whether lethal injection is inhumane. Attorney General Jay Nixon said the decision "reopens the necessary legal avenue for the state of Missouri to move forward on this issue." Gov. Matt Blunt said he is directing the Department of Corrections to prepare execution procedures in compliance with the ruling. "One of the most important jobs I have as governor is to help keep Missourians safe," Blunt said. "Capital punishment is a vital deterrent to the most serious of crimes." Margaret Phillips of the Eastern Missouri Coalition Against the Death Penalty said many questions remain unanswered and it would be unwise for the state to renew executions. "The uncertainty of all of this is a good indication that Missouri needs a moratorium on the death penalty," she said. Taylor, convicted of killing 15-year-old Ann Harrison in Kansas City in 1989, was hours away from being put to death in February 2006 when the execution was halted. His attorney, Ginger Anders, said she would appeal Monday's ruling but declined further comment. Full Coverage: Death Penalty 1 hour, 15 minutes ago Jury: Death for ex-principal in killings AP, Tue May 29, 8:03 PM ET US wrestles with execution question at BBC, Feb 19 After the YouTube execution, what now for death penalty? at The Independent (UK), Jan 04 Supreme Court restores Arizona man's death sentence at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 14 Gov. halts work on new death chamber at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 22 Death row's IQ divide at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 08 Bad medicine on lethal injection at San Francisco Chronicle, May 01 Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. A handout photo from the Missouri Correctional offices shows Michael Anthony Taylor of Kansas City.... Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/vermont_secession Yahoo! News JOHN CURRAN, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 34 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. But to some people in Vermont, the idea is bigger than a $20 novelty. They want Vermont to secede from the United States &#151; peacefully, of course. Disillusioned by what they call an empire about to fall, a small cadre of writers and academics hopes to put the question before citizens in March. Eventually, they want to persuade state lawmakers to declare independence, returning Vermont to the status it held from 1777 to 1791. Neither the state nor the U.S. Constitution explicitly forbids secession, but few people think it is politically viable. "I always thought the Civil War settled that," said Russell Wheeler, a constitutional law expert at the Brookings Institution in Washington, D.C. If Vermont fought and won a war with the federal government, "then you could say Vermont proved the point. But that's not going to happen." Still, the idea has found plenty of sympathetic ears in Vermont, a left-leaning state that said yes to civil unions, no to slavery (before any other) and last year elected a socialist to the U.S. Senate. Supporters have published a "Green Mountain Manifesto" subtitled "Why and How Tiny Vermont Might Help Save America From Itself by Seceding from the Union." In 2005, about 300 people turned out for a secession convention in the Statehouse, and plans for a second one are in the works. A poll this year by the University of Vermont's Center for Rural Studies found that 13 percent of those surveyed support secession, up from 8 percent a year before. "The argument for secession is that the U.S. has become an empire that is essentially ungovernable &#151; it's too big, it's too corrupt and it no longer serves the needs of its citizens," said Rob Williams, editor of Vermont Commons, a quarterly newspaper dedicated to secession. "We have electoral fraud, rampant corporate corruption, a culture of militarism and war," Williams said. "If you care about democracy and self-governance and any kind of representative system, the only constitutional way to preserve what's left of the Republic is to peaceably take apart the empire." Vermont, which was historically conservative, has evolved into one of the nation's most liberal states since the latter part of the 20th century, a tie-dyed bastion of countercultural dissent and New England self-reliance where folks wear their hearts &#151; and their anti-war stickers &#151; on their Subaru station wagon bumpers. Secession movements have a long history. Key West, Fla., staged a mock secession from America in the 1980s. In Vermont, the town of Killington tried to break away and join New Hampshire in 2004, and Hawaii, Alaska, New Hampshire, South Carolina, and Texas all have some form of secession organizations today. The Vermont movement has been simmering for years but gained new traction because of the war, rising oil prices and the formation of several pro-secession groups. Secession supporters hope to have the question considered in March on Town Meeting Day, when voters gather to discuss state and local issues. Thomas Naylor, 70, a retired Duke University economics professor and author, wrote the manifesto and founded a secession group called Second Vermont Republic. His 112-page manifesto contains little explanation of how Vermont would make do without federal aid for security, education and social programs. Some in the movement foresee a Vermont with its own currency and passports, for example, and some form of representative government formed once the secession has taken place. Frank Bryan, a professor at the University of Vermont who has championed the cause for years, said the cachet of secession would make the new republic a magnet. "People would obviously relish coming to the Republic of Vermont, the Switzerland of North America," he said. "Christ, you couldn't keep them away." The Middlebury Institute, a Cold Spring, N.Y., think tank, hosted a North American Separatist Convention last fall in Burlington that drew representatives from 16 organizations. The group is co-sponsoring another conference in October in Chattanooga, Tenn. Of course, skeptics abound. "It doesn't make economic sense, it doesn't make political sense, it doesn't make historical sense. Other than that, it's a good idea," said Paul Gillies, a lawyer and Vermont historian. For now, the would-be secessionists are hoping to draw enough support to get the question on Town Meeting Day agendas. "We're normal human beings," said Williams, 39, a history professor at Champlain College. "But we're serious about this. We want people in Vermont to think about the options going forward. Do you want to stay in an empire that's in deep trouble?" Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/french_market New Orleans vendors ready to return - Yahoo! News New Orleans vendors ready to return By STACEY PLAISANCE, Associated Press Writer AM ET NEW ORLEANS - Candy maker Loretta Harrison sold pralines and other sugary treats at New Orleans' French Market for more than 15 years until Hurricane Katrina shut down her business. With vendors like Harrison dispersed by the storm, French Market Corp., the company that manages the more than 200-year-old market, decided to begin a $5 million renovation. The makeover that began in August is now nearing completion. The French Market consists of a flea market, farmers market and shops running along the Mississippi River between Cafe du Monde and the Old U.S. Mint. In all, the market has nearly 200 tenants who sell food, clothing and art. "The most important change is in the farmer's market," said Patricia Henry, interim director of French Market Corp. "We will have fresh food in the market again, fresh produce, meat, seafood, dairy, dry foods, spices, coffee." Merchants say they are ready to return. Harrison said she has been selling her baked goods and candy out of a warehouse in the Faubourg Marigny, just east of the French Quarter. Harrison's signature items include pralines, praline cookies, fudge, tomato bread and sweet potato cookies. She said such goods belong at the historic market, which has been at the site on the banks of the Mississippi River since 1791. "Everything is indigenous to here," she said. "Pralines came right into the market by slaves. These are old products. It's just like the red beans and rice and the gumbo, it makes New Orleans what it is. We can't forget it." In the early days of the market, which lies on the site of an Indian trading post, Choctaw Indians from north of Lake Pontchartrain sold herbs, spices and handmade crafts. Blacks sold coffee, pralines and calas &#151; rice fritters popular in 19th century. Over time, the market began drawing other vendors, many of whom sold fish and grocery goods. Italians, particularly from Sicily, sold fruits and vegetables. Today, a variety of foods are still for sale, along with crafts, hand-woven baskets, hats, ceramics, African carvings and exotic oils. Before Katrina struck, members of the French Market Corp. and the New Orleans City Council spent years researching ways to restore the open-air market. They held meetings with neighborhood groups, preservationists and vendors. "Everyone agreed they wanted the market to be more like it used to be, when they used to sell a lot of fresh food at the market, and prepare fresh dishes," Henry said. The overhaul, a two-phase project, was expected to take eight to 10 months to complete, but work will not be done until the end of August, Henry said. Vendors can then begin moving in and constructing their cooking spaces and display shelves. They will not begin selling their products until November, Henry said. Harrison says it will take months to set up storage for her cooking supplies, which include a mixer, convection oven and a 56-inch kettle. She will also need to install counters for preparing her baked goods and storage for aprons, linens and T-shirts. While the farmers market used to hold eight vendors, it will now have room for more than a dozen, Henry said. (This version CORRECTS that the market does not include the old U.S. Mint but is bordered by it) Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. A sign points to the farmer's market in the French Market area of the French... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Hurricanes and Tropical Storms &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/brf_dragging_death Woman dragged to death under fleeing van - Yahoo! News Woman dragged to death under fleeing van AM ET FORT LAUDERDALE, Fla. - A woman trying to stop a motorist from fleeing after a collision was dragged for several miles to her death under the man's minivan, officials said Monday. Authorities said they were still searching for the minivan's driver. Sandra Hall was in a Cadillac that was struck by the minivan Sunday night, Broward County sheriff's officials said. The minivan was driven away with the Cadillac in pursuit, and when both vehicles were stopped in traffic Hall got out and stood in front of the minivan, authorities said. The minivan struck Hall, who became lodged underneath the moving vehicle, officials said. Hall, 44, of Fort Lauderdale, was dragged for several miles before she fell from the undercarriage, authorities said. She was pronounced dead at the scene. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/wildfires Barry helps tame wildfires in Ga., Fla. - Yahoo! News Barry helps tame wildfires in Ga., Fla. Sun Jun 3, 9:26 PM ET WAYCROSS, Ga. - Tropical Storm Barry and its remnants gave a much-needed soaking to thousands of acres of burning swamp and timberland in northern Florida and southeastern Georgia. The remains of the storm rode up the East Coast Sunday with gusty winds and rain falling as far north as Upstate New York, according to Weather Underground, a commercial weather service. Wind gusts along the coast were measured at 44 mph on Cape Fear in southern North Carolina and heavy rain was noted throughout the Southeast and Mid-Atlantic coasts, Weather Underground reported. By Sunday afternoon, Mount Vernon, Ga., received 8 inches of rain from the storm, West Palm Beach, Fla., had 7 inches and Hardeeville, S.C., saw more than 6 inches, according to the . Most areas across the Southeast received smaller amounts. Barry, which weakened to a depression Saturday morning, was a tremendous help to a thirsty Southeast. But residents living near Georgia's fires should not be complacent, said Larry Morris with the joint information center in Waycross. "It's still a live fire. Contained does not mean controlled, and it does not mean extinguished," Morris said. Morris estimates that the fire, which crews have battled for more than a month, is now about 85 percent contained. The rain was not enough to put out the blazes, but officials said the moist conditions allowed firefighters to focus on hot spots spared by the rain and on areas that are already beginning to dry out and could potentially catch fire again. Two large fires have charred more than 600,000 acres, or roughly 937 square miles, of swamp and timberland since a tree fell on a power line south of Waycross on April 16 and then a lightning strike inside the Okefenokee Swamp on May 5 ignited the second blaze. The fires destroyed about 30 homes and prompted several evacuations, which had all been lifted by Sunday. The Okefenokee National Wildlife Refuge and the part of the Osceola National Forest north of Interstate 10 remained closed Sunday. Full Coverage: Wildfires & Forest Fires Barry helps tame wildfires in Ga., Fla. AP, Sun Jun 3, 9:26 PM ET Tropical depression Barry brings rain to Florida Reuters, Sat Jun 2, 5:25 PM ET A rush to grab pets and wallets at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 09 Animals, keepers stay at L.A. Zoo at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 09 Six weeks later, Georgia fires still raging at Christian Science Monitor, May 30 Fire out of control in the Pinelands at Philadelphia Inquirer, May 16 at Times-Standard Online, May 04 Protect the Tillamook Forest at The Oregonian, Sep 29 Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Hurricanes and Tropical Storms &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/dallas_gay_candidate Yahoo! News JEFF CARLTON, Associated Press Writer DALLAS - This conservative metropolis could become the nation's largest city to elect an openly gay mayor if a longtime city council member wins a runoff election later this month. Ed Oakley's candidacy is the latest indication that Dallas' reputation as a conservative stronghold is giving way to more diversity. The city is already home to several gay elected officials, including the sheriff. "Dallas is less and less the Dallas that people think it is," said Cal Jillson, a political science professor at Southern Methodist University. "And Dallas is less and less the Dallas that it used to be." In the mayoral race, Oakley and former construction company CEO Tom Leppert emerged from a crowded 11-candidate field that included another openly gay man and a transgendered woman. Oakley and Leppert will be the only candidates in the June 16 runoff. But if Oakley, 54, is on the edge of history, he doesn't talk about it. His sexuality hasn't figured prominently in the campaign. Oakley said his internal polling showed it had little impact on voters. "I have never made this an issue, a part of what I am or who I am or what I have done to represent the community," said Oakley, a small business owner. Dallas, with a population of 1.2 million, is home to a growing gay community with an estimated 120,000 lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgendered households. The city has nondiscrimination policies covering sexual orientation and gender identity and offers health insurance to the domestic partners of city employees, measures praised as progressive by local gay-rights activists. "I think some people don't realize that Dallas is very diverse: economically, ethnically, culturally," said Pete Webb, president of the Dallas Gay and Lesbian Alliance. That has helped mute any controversy about Oakley's sexuality in a state where two years ago voters approved a ban on gay marriage by a 3-to-1 margin. There also are other signals of political shifts. In November, Dallas County Democrats swept Republicans out of power, winning 42 judicial races and six countywide offices. Among the winners was District Attorney Craig Watkins, the first Democrat to hold the position in more than two decades. The public hasn't seemed interested in Oakley's sexuality, but voters also have been disinterested in the election itself. Only about 13 percent of registered voters turned out in the initial election. Leppert received fewer than 20,000 votes and Oakley fewer than 15,000. That has local gay activists hitting the pavement to support him. Jesse Garcia, president of the Stonewall Democrats of Dallas, said his group "has gone into our gay bars and stressed early voting." "We are very excited," Garcia said. "We have ... to galvanize the troops and let them know not only can we make history but we can keep Dallas progressive." The biggest city with an openly gay mayor is Providence, R.I., where Mayor David N. Cicilline leads a city of 177,000. San Diego, with a population of about 1.2 million, briefly had an openly gay mayor in 2005, when a councilwoman was appointed to the position after a former mayor resigned and his interim replacement was convicted of corruption. Oakley's supporters say the thrice-elected city council member has high name recognition among voters and a long history of involvement in city politics. He's been judged "as an incumbent member of the city council ... and not as a gay candidate," Jillson said. "I'm not discounting Oakley based on who he likes or doesn't like, and I don't think people view him being gay as limiting to his ability to make decisions," said Mark Jones, a businessman who was having lunch with black professionals and church leaders in South Dallas. "This is not a town where homophobia will affect people's decisions." Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Gay & Lesbian Issues &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/threatened_coast Yahoo! News NOAKI SCHWARTZ, Associated Press Writer AM ET MALIBU, Calif. - Before getting to some of the world's most beautiful beaches, it helps to know a few things about the law &#151; and the locals. While California's Coastal Act of 1976 ensures beach access, the rich and famous who want to keep the state's dramatic coast exclusive have been posting bogus "no parking" and "private beach" signs here and elsewhere. They've done it so effectively in Malibu for so long that unfortunate beachgoers occasionally get ticketed. "It doesn't sound like a big deal to put in a sign or two," said Linda Locklin, of the California Coastal Commission. "But pretty soon if you have all the public access ways with signs or gates, it's a huge problem." The promise of safe passage to the sea is just one front the commission concedes it's losing amid budget constraints. Development projects the agency must review are put on hold, communities are left without an updated blueprint for regulating growth along their shore, and the state can't process paperwork to accept offers of free land. Since 1980, while inflation has increased 160 percent, the commission's total funding has risen only 9 percent &#151; from $13.5 million to $16.3 million. At times it has been cut nearly in half. The commission's full-time staff has been slashed from 200 in 1980 to 138 today; only 11 enforcement officers investigate violations along the 1,100-mile coastline. "We haven't had an officer north of San Francisco since 2001," said Lisa Haage, the agency's chief of enforcement. "It's a full day drive and then we can't pay for a hotel." With so few watching, residents have built illegal homes on wetlands near the Oregon line and developers have graded over coastal sage scrub in the Santa Monica Mountains. They were eventually caught and are in the process of being punished, but the damage was done. Officers can only resolve about a dozen complaints a year, leaving hundreds of other cases languishing &#151; from complaints about neighbors constructing fences without permits to a developer not building a promised public walkway. "We do the best we can but things fall through the cracks," said Peter Douglas, the commission's longtime director. "It's been an extremely frustrating experience." Voters established the largely independent, quasi-judicial commission in 1972 out of growing concern that rampant development would eclipse the state's world-famous beaches, as well as the average person's ability to get to them. The commission is composed of 12 voting members appointed by the governor, the state Senate Rules Committee and the Assembly speaker. The Coastal Act gives the Coastal Commision more reach and legal muscle than coastal programs in other states. The law placed a priority on public recreation over private development, created protection for nesting birds and other animals, and gave the agency authority to enforce the law. But critics say the commission mismanages its funding by tackling minor land use issues that should be left to local communities. They say it should focus on development issues with statewide impact. "They're a very aggressive, very pro-active bureaucracy," said Fred Gaines, an attorney who regularly represents property owners against the commission. "Their view of preserving coastal resources is being anti-development down to what size light bulb you can have in your front porch light." 's proposed budget for next year would keep commission funding levels near this year's $16.3 million. The agency doesn't have enough money for a spokesperson. Times got so tough that the commission decided to save money by punching their own holes in paper instead of buying it prepunched. "You have to understand that all of this translates into a lack of adequate protection for the coast," said longtime commissioner Sara Wan. "The real thing that suffers is the coast itself." Only the most determined visitors find the gems hidden along the 27-mile stretch of Malibu coast. Case in point: after orange traffic cones discouraged parking near Lechuza Beach on a previous Memorial Day, someone removed the sign this year that pointed the way to the beach. State officials replaced the "Beach Access" sign last week so people can find their way to the water &#151; at least until another ploy stops a new wave of beachgoers. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't have this view of public beach and private residences from the top of a... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/trash_probe Probation for mayor in corruption case - Yahoo! News Probation for mayor in corruption case By CARA RUBINSKY, Associated Press Writer PM ET NEW HAVEN, Conn. - A former mayor of Waterbury was sentenced Monday to five years of probation for his role in a trash-hauling corruption case. Joseph Santopietro, 48, was among 29 people charged in connection with a federal investigation of mob influence over the trash-hauling industry in Connecticut and New York. He pleaded guilty in March to racketeering conspiracy. "I fully accept responsibility for my actions," Santopietro told U.S. District Judge Ellen Bree Burns at Monday's sentencing. Burns ordered Santopietro to spend the first six months of his probation confined to his home, and fined him $30,000. Under federal sentencing guidelines, Santopietro could have faced 12 to 18 months in prison. Santopietro, who worked as a consultant for Diversified Waste Disposal, admitted participating in a so-called property rights scheme in which trash haulers carved out routes for each other and agreed not to poach customers. Prosecutors said he used his influence to dissuade a competing trash hauler from honoring a contract with a new customer who had previously used one of the companies involved in the case. Defense attorney Martin Minnella had argued that Santopietro is needed at home to care for his wife, a divorce lawyer injured when a client's estranged husband shot her two years ago. Prosecutors agreed not to recommend a sentence. Santopietro was Waterbury's mayor for six years, losing re-election in 1991 while under federal indictment for conspiring with bankers and land developers to trade favors on land deals for bribes and kickbacks. He was convicted of embezzling federal funds, bank fraud and tax evasion, and served more than six years in prison. As part of the federal investigation, a state lawmaker pleaded guilty Monday to a misdemeanor threat charge. Senate Minority Leader Louis DeLuca, 73, admitted he had asked a businessman with suspected mob ties in 2005 to threaten someone he believed was having an abusive domestic relationship with one of his relatives. "I did not want violence, or for the perpetrator to get hurt," the Woodbury Republican said. "I just wanted the physical abuse of my relative to stop." Investigators found a note about the request in the home of a Danbury trash hauler charged in the federal probe, prosecutors said. They stopped the assault by parking a police car in front of the associate's house. DeLuca was fined $2,000 fine and ordered to donate $1,500 to charity as part of a plea deal. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/professor_hunger_strike MIT prof quits to support colleague - Yahoo! News MIT prof quits to support colleague AM ET CAMBRIDGE, Mass. - A prominent Massachusetts Institute of Technology professor has resigned to protest the university's treatment of a colleague who claims he was denied tenure because he is black, school officials said. Frank Douglas, executive director of the MIT Center for Biomedical Innovation, wrote in an e-mail obtained by The Boston Globe that he will leave at the end of the month because MIT refused to reconsider its decision not to grant tenure to James Sherley. MIT said in a statement it "deeply regrets" the decision by Douglas, who also is black. It also said it never agreed to revisit Sherley's tenure application. Sherley, a stem cell biologist, was turned down for tenure two years ago when his department head did not nominate him. He claimed racism but MIT officials denied that the allegation. His faculty appointment expires June 30 but he said Sunday he will not leave until MIT re-examines his case. Sherley held a 12-day fast in February to focus attention on "issues of equity, diversity and justice at MIT and in higher education." Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/michigan_abortion Appeals court rejects Mich. abortion law - Yahoo! News Appeals court rejects Mich. abortion law By DAVID EGGERT, Associated Press Writer PM ET LANSING, Mich. - A federal appeals court Monday rejected Michigan's attempt to ban a procedure opponents call partial-birth abortion, ruling the law unconstitutional because it could also prohibit other abortion procedures. A three-judge panel of the 6th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeal said the Michigan Legislature would have been "virtually guaranteed" a favorable result on appeal had it copied an Ohio law that the 6th Circuit already has upheld. "It instead opted to use statutory language that pushed almost every boundary that the Supreme Court has imposed for these types of laws," the judges said. Previous attempts by Michigan lawmakers to stop the procedure were struck down by federal courts in 1997 and 2001. in April upheld the federal Partial-Birth Abortion Ban Act, with the majority opinion carefully distinguishing the controversial procedure from a more common abortion method used in the second trimester of pregnancy. The latter was unaffected by the ruling. The appeals panel affirmed a Detroit district judge's opinion that the 2004 Legal Birth Definition Act in Michigan places an "undue burden" on a woman's right to have an abortion. Abortion rights groups have said the law &#151; unlike the federal ban and the law in Ohio - overreached and would have banned pre-viable abortions, including the most common method of second-trimester abortion. The appeals court agreed. "The Michigan statute contains no similar exception or clear definitions that would avoid sweeping up protected abortion procedures within its prohibition," the court wrote. The Michigan Legislature approved the abortion law in June 2004. Hundreds of thousands of voters signed petitions that allowed the bill to become law with only the approval of the House and Senate &#151; both of which were controlled by Republicans at the time &#151; after Democratic Gov. Jennifer Granholm vetoed it. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/military_protest_hearing Anti-war Marine blasts military - Yahoo! News Anti-war Marine blasts military By HEATHER HOLLINGSWORTH, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 22 minutes ago KANSAS CITY, Mo. - An War veteran accused the Marine Corps on Monday of causing a "disgusting waste of government resources" by holding a hearing about whether he should be punished for wearing his uniform during an anti-war protest. Marine Corps officials argue they are enforcing military codes in the case of Cpl. Adam Kokesh. Kokesh, 25, participated in an anti-war protest in Washington in March. When he was identified in a photo caption in The Washington Post, a superior officer sent him an e-mail saying he might have violated a rule prohibiting troops from wearing uniforms without authorization. Kokesh responded with a letter that contained an obscenity. Kokesh is a member of the Individual Ready Reserve, which consists mainly of those who have left active duty but still have time remaining on their eight-year military obligations. His service is due to end June 18, but the Marine Corps is seeking to let him go two weeks early with a less-than-honorable discharge. That could cut some of his health benefits and force him to repay about $10,800 he received to obtain his undergraduate degree on the GI Bill. Kokesh's attorney, Lt. Jeremy Melaragno, said during an administrative separation board hearing that his client's free-speech rights are at stake. "It has everything to do with freedom of speech," Melaragno said. "Ask yourself, would we be here if he was advocating for the Bush administration?" During a break in the hearing, Kokesh told reporters that the case appears to be punitive. "More importantly, it's a case of fraud, waste and abuse and a disgusting waste of government resources," Kokesh said. "While Marines are dying every day in Iraq, they are spending time investigating members of the individual ready reserves for political activity." Kokesh was honorably discharged following a combat tour in Iraq, but he remains part of the Individual Ready Reserve, comprised of those who have left active duty but still have time remaining on their eight-year military obligations. His attorneys said Kokesh was not subject to military rules during the protest because he was not on active duty. They said the protest was a theatrical performance, which meant wearing a uniform was a not a violation of military rules. The military considered it a political event, at which personnel are not allowed to wear their uniforms without authorization. The Marines' first witness, Maj. John R. Whyte, testified Monday he was the officers who wrote Kokesh the e-mail informing him the Marines were investigating the possible uniform violation. On cross examination, the defense had Whyte read a memo he had written on how the Corps should respond to protests. "There should be manpower assigned to search for and remediate misinformation by opposition groups and individuals," he read. Whyte recommended Kokesh's discharge be "other than honorable." Several Kokesh supporters turned out Monday at the Marine Corps Mobilization Command and stood in front of a bus painted with anti-war slogans. Kokesh was a reservist in an artillery unit when he became disillusioned with the war during his first tour. He said he believes there is no way for Iraq to achieve rule of law with a foreign military imposing martial law. Full Coverage: U.S. Armed Forces China&#39;s military must be more transparent: Pace AFP, AM ET US military analysis says troop &#39;surge&#39; in Iraq short of goal AFP, AM ET Lessons from the Great War at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), May 28 Another Memorial Day Marks Grief's Journey at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 2 Marines Deny Suspecting Haditha War Crime at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Record Turnout Marks Rolling Thunder Ride's 20th Anniversary at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 Memorial Day is a chance to reflect Blame politicians, not those fighting at L.A. Daily News, May 28 Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Marine Corps veteran Adam Kokesh talks with reporters during a news conference in Washington, Friday,... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_plot Yahoo! News LARRY McSHANE, Associated Press Writer AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. The informant made several overseas trips to discuss the plot against John F. Kennedy International Airport, even visiting a radical Muslim group's compound in Trinidad, officials said. He also joined the plotters on airport surveillance trips &#151; where authorities were waiting, they said. The suspects were convinced he was guided by a higher purpose: The ringleader believed the informant "had been sent by Allah to be the one" to pull off the bombing, according to a federal complaint. Authorities said the plot, revealed Saturday, demonstrated the growing importance of informants in efforts to combat terrorism, particularly as smaller radical groups become more aggressive. Accused mastermind Russell Defreitas, 63, is now in custody in New York, where he was due to have a bail hearing Wednesday. But two other suspects, Kareem Ibrahim and Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's Parliament, were in Trinidad and will fight extradition to the United States, their lawyer, Rajid Persad, told a Trinidadian court Monday. The two made their initial court appearance there on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the government of the United States. The judge set a bail hearing for June 11 and an extradition hearing Aug. 2. Authorities in Trinidad are seeking a fourth suspect, Abdel Nur. Tom Corrigan, a former member of the -New York Police Department Joint Terrorism Task Force, said the Kennedy airport case and the recent plot to attack Fort Dix illustrated the need for inside information. Six men were arrested in a plot to attack soldiers at the New Jersey military base after an FBI informant infiltrated that group. "These have been two significant cases back-to-back where informants were used," Corrigan said. "These terrorists are in our own backyard. They may have to reach out to people they don't necessarily trust, but they need &#151; for guns, explosives, whatever." Without informants, Corrigan said, investigators are often left with little more than educated guesswork. "In most cases, you can't get from A to B without an informant," the ex-NYPD detective said. In the Kennedy airport case, the informant was a twice-convicted drug dealer who found himself in the midst of what investigators called a terrorist plot conceived as more devastating than the Sept. 11 attacks. "Would you like to die as a martyr?" the informant was asked, according to the indictment. He unhesitatingly replied yes and soon was making surveillance trips around the airport &#151; the "chicken farm," as the planners dubbed their target. Authorities said the JFK scheme was an example of homegrown terrorism. Defreitas, 63, immigrated to the U.S. more than 30 years ago, but he told the federal informant that his feelings of disgust toward his adopted homeland had lingered for years. "Before terrorism started in this country," he said in one secretly recorded conversation. Defreitas was arrested Friday night outside Brooklyn's Lindenwood Diner &#151; a spot once bugged by federal officials tracking former Gambino family boss John A. "Junior" Gotti. The four Muslim men accused in the JFK plot didn't turn to Pakistan, for support after targeting the airport, home to an average of 1,000 daily flights and 45 million passengers annually. Instead, according to a federal complaint, the informant, Ibrahim and Defreitas visited a compound belonging to Jamaat al Muslimeen, a radical Islamic group known for launching a bloody 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad that involved taking the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage. It left 24 people dead. Though Jamaat al Muslimeen did have contact with the men accused in the Kennedy airport plot, it is not accused of offering them any support. The group, whose followers are largely black converts to Sunni Islam, has faded as a political force in Trinidad as its leader, Yasin Abu Bakr, fends off criminal charges of inciting violence. The rebels in the 1990 raid on Parliament surrendered and were pardoned. When Defreitas discussed his radical "brothers" with the informant, he made it clear they were not Arabs, but from Trinidad and Guyana. The complaint made clear the informant had deeply infiltrated the group. Defreitas, a retired JFK airport cargo worker, made four reconnaissance missions to the airport, authorities said. They captured each one on audio and video equipment. Ibrahim and another suspect, Abdul Kadir, were in custody in Trinidad awaiting extradition hearings. Officials identified Kadir as a former mayor of a Guyanese town and a member of the country's Parliament. Associated Press Writers Tony Fraser in Port-of-Spain, Trinidad, and Pat Milton in New York contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case AP, 32 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 34 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early in Times Square cement box stunt Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't tanks are seen at JFK International Airport in New York Sunday, June 3, ... JFK Airport Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust JFK Plot Investigators averted recent terror threat via outreach to Muslim community. &raquo; More ABC News video Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/tuberculosis_infection Yahoo! News COLLEEN SLEVIN, Associated Press Writer DENVER - The man infected with drug-resistant tuberculosis who set off an international health scare could be allowed outside of his isolated hospital room if a test for the bacteria is negative, a hospital official said Monday. The patient, Andrew Speaker, is being treated at the National Jewish Medical and Research Center. Two tests of his sputum have been negative, meaning they have not shown the presence of TB bacteria, and results of a third test were expected late Monday or Tuesday, hospital spokesman William Allstetter said in a statement. If the third is negative, Speaker, 31, would be considered "relatively noncontagious" and could be allowed brief escorted trips outside his room wearing a mask, Allstetter said. But he stressed that such a finding would not mean Speaker cannot transmit the disease, saying the bacteria could still grow in Speaker's lungs and sputum. Drug-resistant TB patients who do venture outside are kept far from patients and anyone else in the community so they pose no risk of infecting others. Earlier Monday, Speaker's parents and in-laws stressed in an interview on "Good Morning America" that he would never have traveled to Europe for his wedding and honeymoon if he thought he was contagious. "We're in hell and we want to get out of hell," said the man's father, Ted Speaker. Speaker's parents denied that their son was reckless. "We are not people of reckless behavior, nor is Andrew," said his mother, Cheryl Speaker. If he thought he was contagious, she said: "He would have been the first one not to go." Ted Speaker said he taped a meeting in which a doctor says three times that his son was not contagious though the doctors preferred that he not fly. The elder Speaker said he will release the tape at some point. While many people were outraged by Speaker's actions, his father didn't seemed worried when asked about possibly being served with a lawsuit over the case. "If they want to serve me go ahead," Ted Speaker said. "I am not at fault. My son is not at fault." Before leaving last month for Europe for his wedding and honeymoon, Speaker has said he was advised by Fulton County, Ga., health authorities that he was not contagious or a danger to anyone. Officials told him they would prefer he didn't fly, but no one ordered him not to, he said. Speaker was in Europe when he learned tests showed he had not just TB, but an extremely drug-resistant strain known as XDR. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, he flew home for treatment, fearing he wouldn't survive if he didn't reach the U.S., he said. The family said that a Centers for Disease Control and Prevention official told them the only way for him to get back to America from Italy would be to hire a private plane. But the parents said they are not rich and could not have easily afforded a private jet. "We work hard," said Betsy Cooksey, a school teacher and mother of Andrew Speaker's new bride, Sarah. "We're not in careers that are high paying." Speaker's father-in-law, Robert Cooksey, works for the , where he specializes in tuberculosis and other bacteria. "It's the height of irony," he said of the situation. Robert Cooksey also reiterated that Andrew Speaker did not get the illness from him. Andrew Speaker was quarantined May 25, after his return from his honeymoon, in the first such action taken by the federal government since 1963. After being hospitalized in Atlanta, he was flown to Denver on Thursday for treatment. Speaker was taking antibiotics to battle a tennis-ball-size infection in his lung. Doctors said his treatment could include surgery to remove the infected tissue if the drugs don't work. Tests so far indicate Speaker's risk of spreading the infection are low, doctors said. Eleven people who were on flights with Speaker have tested negative for the disease, health officials in South Carolina said Monday. More than two dozen University of South Carolina Aiken business students were on an eight-hour flight to Paris with Speaker. (This version CORRECTS last graf to correct 11 tested were on 'flights,' instead of an eight-hour flight to Paris.) Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare 26 minutes ago TB patient&#39;s family defend controversial travel Reuters, PM ET The Denver Post - Lawyer deemed "all-around great guy" at Denver Post, Jun 01 Tuberculosis Patient's Voyage Stirs Debate Over Security Issues at The Wall Street Journal, Jun 01 TB patient warned other travelers at Denver Post, Jun 02 Future in-law helped reach TB diagnosis at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Jun 02 Have Germs, Will Travel at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 02 Isolating an Evasive TB Patient at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early in Times Square cement box stunt Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't undated photo released by the University of Georgia School of Law on Thursday May... Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws Ted and Cheryl Speaker defend their son&#39;s actions. &raquo; More ABC News video &raquo; Show all news video Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/pedestrians_struck Police: Driver used crack before crash - Yahoo! News Police: Driver used crack before crash PM ET WASHINGTON - The woman charged with plowing a car through a crowded street festival at speeds up to 70 mph had been "smoking crack all day long," Police Chief Cathy Lanier said, citing statements from the woman and witnesses. At least 40 people were injured as the car sent people and baby strollers flying, Mayor Adrian M. Fenty said Sunday. Tonya Bell, 30, was preliminarily charged with aggravated assault while armed, with the "armed" designation referring to use of a vehicle. She faced a hearing in District of Columbia Superior Court on Monday. Authorities believe Bell, of Oxon Hill, Md., was going about 70 mph Saturday evening when she drove through Unifest, a church-sponsored street festival in southeast Washington. She was treated for an ankle injury, police said. Officials were still waiting for toxicology results. Bell appeared to be laughing as she drove the car with flattened tires and broken windows into the crowd, said Linda Greene, who saw Bell's car from her porch. "The car just passed so fast, and all of a sudden I just heard people screaming," said Denise Jackson. "I turned around, and it was like bodies falling out of the sky." Her son, 4-year-old Marcellus Jackson, was thrown out of the speeding car's path by his father, Fenty said. Marcellus suffered a broken leg. His father, Vincent Hayes, was hit by the car but was OK. Police said Bell was seen driving erratically and had struck an unmarked police car 20 minutes before the injuries at the street festival. Police Cmdr. Patrick Burke said officers had followed Bell's station wagon but were told to stop because the traffic violation did not pose a threat to officers. After the car entered the crowd, police didn't use their weapons because of the risk to civilians. Instead, officers risked their lives and threw two motor scooters under the station wagon to bring it to a stop, Lanier said. Two officers suffered minor injuries. One woman said her husband reached into the car and put it in park. A 7-year-old girl in the car with Bell was not injured and was taken by Child Protective Services. Her identity was not released. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070603/ap_on_re_us/texas_executions Texas inmate seeks jokes for last words - Yahoo! News Texas inmate seeks jokes for last words By MICHAEL GRACZYK, Associated Press Writer Sun Jun 3, 7:52 PM ET LIVINGSTON, Texas - A condemned inmate wants to leave them laughing. Patrick Knight is collecting jokes and will pick the funniest one for his last statement before he is set to die June 26 for shooting his neighbors, Walter and Mary Werner, to death almost 16 years ago outside Amarillo. Randall County Sheriff Joel Richardson thinks the whole idea is insensitive. "This tells you a little bit about the guy's character, anyway," said Richardson, who was chief deputy at the time of the Werners' killings and plans to witness Knight's execution. Richardson said that the Werners' son, who has since moved out of Texas, has said he won't speak about the case anymore. "They don't want to draw any more attention to this guy than is possible," Richardson said. Knight acknowledges there's nothing funny about his execution. "I'm not trying to disrespect the Werners or anything like that," he told The Associated Press from death row. "I'm not trying to say I don't care what's going on. I'm about to die. I'm not going to sit here and whine and cry and moan and everything like that when I'm facing the punishment I've been given. "I'm not asking for money. I'm not asking for pen pals or anything like that. All I'm asking for is jokes," Knight said. He's had about 250 wisecracks mailed to him on death row or e-mailed to a friend who has a Web site for him. "Lawyer jokes are real popular," he said. "Some of them are a little on the edge. I'm not going to use any profanity if I can find the one I want, or any vulgar content. It wouldn't be bad if it was a little bit on the edge. That would be cool." Knight, 39, would be the last of five condemned inmates set to die over three weeks this month in Texas, the nation's most active state in carrying out capital punishment. Fourteen executions already have happened in Texas this year and if all five take place in June, the pace will be just shy of the record of 40 executions set in 2000. At least 10 other inmates already have execution dates set for the second half of the year. Knight said he got the idea for a joke as his last statement after a friend, Vincent Gutierrez, was executed earlier this year and laughed from the death chamber gurney: "Where's a stunt double when you need one?" "I know I'm not innocent," said Knight, who believes his appeals have been exhausted. "They think they're killing me. They think they're punishing me. They've already punished me. I've already had 16 years of punishment. They're releasing me. They're letting me go. That's helping me out. That's the way I look at it." Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/missouri_executions Yahoo! News JIM SALTER, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 25 minutes ago ST. LOUIS - A federal appeals court opened the way for Missouri to resume executing inmates, ruling Monday that the state's lethal injection procedure is not cruel and unusual punishment. The case filed on behalf of condemned killer Michael Taylor had effectively halted Missouri executions since early last year. A judge said he wanted to be sure that the three-drug injection method did not cause risk of pain and suffering. A three-judge panel of the 8th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals found "no evidence to indicate that any of the last six inmates executed suffered any unnecessary pain," according to its ruling. The court's decision reversed a ruling by U.S. District Judge Fernando Gaitan Jr. ordering reforms to Missouri's lethal injection procedures. He wanted the state to involve a doctor specializing in anesthesia, but the state has been unable to find a doctor willing to participate. Missouri is among nine states that have put executions on hold as it grapples with whether lethal injection is inhumane. Attorney General Jay Nixon said the decision "reopens the necessary legal avenue for the state of Missouri to move forward on this issue." Gov. Matt Blunt said he is directing the Department of Corrections to prepare execution procedures in compliance with the ruling. "One of the most important jobs I have as governor is to help keep Missourians safe," Blunt said. "Capital punishment is a vital deterrent to the most serious of crimes." Margaret Phillips of the Eastern Missouri Coalition Against the Death Penalty said many questions remain unanswered and it would be unwise for the state to renew executions. "The uncertainty of all of this is a good indication that Missouri needs a moratorium on the death penalty," she said. Taylor, convicted of killing 15-year-old Ann Harrison in Kansas City in 1989, was hours away from being put to death in February 2006 when the execution was halted. His attorney, Ginger Anders, said she would appeal Monday's ruling but declined further comment. Full Coverage: Death Penalty 1 hour, 19 minutes ago Jury: Death for ex-principal in killings AP, Tue May 29, 8:03 PM ET US wrestles with execution question at BBC, Feb 19 After the YouTube execution, what now for death penalty? at The Independent (UK), Jan 04 Supreme Court restores Arizona man's death sentence at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 14 Gov. halts work on new death chamber at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 22 Death row's IQ divide at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 08 Bad medicine on lethal injection at San Francisco Chronicle, May 01 Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't handout photo from the Missouri Correctional offices shows Michael Anthony Taylor of Kansas City.... Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/lancaster_shooting Phila. man charged with shooting 5 - Yahoo! News Phila. man charged with shooting 5 PM ET LANCASTER, Pa. - A man shot and wounded five people, including his girlfriend's 2-year-old grandson, and then turned himself in less than an hour later and confessed, police said. Mark Q. "Mustafa" Galloway, 39, called police while he fled from the scene of the shooting early Sunday, said Lancaster police Chief Sam Gatchell. He walked into the Lancaster County Prison, where he admitted to shooting his girlfriend, Tameka Rodriguez, 35, three of her family members and her daughter's boyfriend, authorities said. "The defendant stated, 'I did it,' and asked, 'How's Tameka doing?'" when interviewed at the prison, according to the arrest affidavit. He later admitted to all five shootings, police said. The police chief said Rodriguez recently moved back to Lancaster after she and Galloway had problems. Witnesses told police the two began dating last summer. "She wasn't hiding from him. They were interacting, but things went bad at some point," Gatchell said. The five were shot outside the front door of a home about 6 a.m., police said. Rodriguez and her mother, Betty Jane Hogue, 54, who was shot multiple times, were being treated at a hospital, police said. Also shot were Rodriguez's daughter, Juanita Rodriguez-Rose, 19; her son, Zymir Rodriguez-Rose, 2, and her boyfriend, Luis Martinez-Lopez, 29, police said. "When you shoot somebody more than once, obviously you mean business," Gatchell said. "And this guy wasn't aiming at their legs." The suspected weapon, a 9 mm semiautomatic handgun with an altered or obliterated serial number, was recovered from a trash can, investigators said. Galloway is charged with four counts of attempted homicide, five counts of aggravated assault and firearms violations. He is being held at Lancaster County prison on $1 million bail. It was not clear whether he was represented by a lawyer on Monday. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/i/718 The top U.S. national news headlines from Yahoo! News AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. JFK Airport Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust JFK Plot hour, 25 minutes ago 60 MINUTES ON YAHOO! NEWS Will he continue to help people commit suicide? Undocumented students wait anxiously for new immigration plan. A California man devours 59 and a half hot dogs to set a world record. PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops, and posts clips online. Anti-war Marine blasts military 2 hours, 23 minutes ago KANSAS CITY, Mo. - An Iraq War veteran accused the Marine Corps on Monday of causing a "disgusting waste of government resources" by holding a hearing about whether he should be punished for wearing his uniform during an anti-war protest. Appeals court rejects Mich. abortion law PM ET LANSING, Mich. - A federal appeals court Monday rejected Michigan's attempt to ban a procedure opponents call partial-birth abortion, ruling the law unconstitutional because it could also prohibit other abortion procedures. hours, 35 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. Police: Driver used crack before crash PM ET WASHINGTON - The woman charged with plowing a car through a crowded street festival at speeds up to 70 mph had been "smoking crack all day long," Police Chief Cathy Lanier said, citing statements from the woman and witnesses. Airman testifies about deputy shooting 1 hour, 43 minutes ago SAN BERNARDINO, Calif. - An Iraq war veteran testified Monday that a deputy ordered him to get up from the ground twice during a videotaped confrontation after a car chase and then shot him three times when he tried to comply. Phila. man charged with shooting 5 PM ET LANCASTER, Pa. - A man shot and wounded five people, including his girlfriend's 2-year-old grandson, and then turned himself in less than an hour later and confessed, police said. AM ET MALIBU, Calif. - Before getting to some of the world's most beautiful beaches, it helps to know a few things about the law &#151; and the locals. While California's Coastal Act of 1976 ensures beach access, the rich and famous who want to keep the state's dramatic coast exclusive have been posting bogus "no parking" and "private beach" signs here and elsewhere. New Orleans vendors ready to return AM ET NEW ORLEANS - Candy maker Loretta Harrison sold pralines and other sugary treats at New Orleans' French Market for more than 15 years until Hurricane Katrina shut down her business. Probation for mayor in corruption case PM ET NEW HAVEN, Conn. - A former mayor of Waterbury was sentenced Monday to five years of probation for his role in a trash-hauling corruption case. Gates Foundation offers Wa. school &#36;105M AM ET SEATTLE - The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation is giving $105 million to the University of Washington to open a new research center to assess the performance of global health programs. MIT prof quits to support colleague AM ET CAMBRIDGE, Mass. - A prominent Massachusetts Institute of Technology professor has resigned to protest the university's treatment of a colleague who claims he was denied tenure because he is black, school officials said. Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AM ET EXETER, N.H. - After people called 911 to report hearing explosions, emergency officials initially thought there had been underground methane gas blasts. But it turns out that New Hampshire actually had three small earthquakes over the weekend. Woman dragged to death under fleeing van AM ET FORT LAUDERDALE, Fla. - A woman trying to stop a motorist from fleeing after a collision was dragged for several miles to her death under the man's minivan, officials said Monday. Texas inmate seeks jokes for last words Sun Jun 3, 7:52 PM ET LIVINGSTON, Texas - A condemned inmate wants to leave them laughing. Barry helps tame wildfires in Ga., Fla. Sun Jun 3, 9:26 PM ET WAYCROSS, Ga. - Tropical Storm Barry and its remnants gave a much-needed soaking to thousands of acres of burning swamp and timberland in northern Florida and southeastern Georgia. Crimes and Trials News Trial to open for Wall Street executive accused in ex-girlfriend&#39;s Nantucket murder Fri Jun 1, 3:24 PM ET In the years before her stabbing = death in 2004, New York entrepreneur Elizabeth Lochtefeld had begun a new phase in her life, according to friends and relatives. Defense: Actress who died at Spector mansion had visions of another Hollywood tragedy Thu May 31, 5:42 PM ET LOS ANGELES (C ourt TV) - The psychological state of the actress shot in Phil Spector&#39;s mansion took center stage at his murder trial Thursday when the defense suggested Lana Clarkson was deeply depressed and suffered from vivid hallucinations about another Hollywood tragedy. Lawnmower driver clipped on way to the bank Thu May 31, 5:36 PM ET (Court TV) - When an Arkansas woman wanted to check her bank account&#39;s balance, she didn&#39;t use the Internet or a phone. Accused fake cop charged with new crimes 1 hour, 42 minutes ago RIVERHEAD, N.Y. - A man previously charged with impersonating a police officer pleaded not guilty Monday to allegations of using that ploy to rape a woman, molest teenagers, scam a bus driver and commit other crimes. Jury seated for trial in '60s killings 1 hour, 52 minutes ago JACKSON, Miss. - A jury of eight whites and four blacks was seated Monday for the trial of a reputed Ku Klux Klan member who is charged with kidnapping and conspiracy in the killings of two black teenagers in 1964. Murder on the rise The availability of guns is just one of the reasons murder is on the rise in Philadelphia. CNN&#39;s Kelli Arena reports. &raquo; More CNN video Plane Crashes Into California Homes No fatalities after a plane slams into two homes, lands in yard of third. &raquo; More ABC News video Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI Ohio police pull over a man who says he stole a golf cart because he was too intoxicated to drive his own car to a friend&#39;s wedding. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video &raquo; More from Y! Finance Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views &raquo; All Full Coverage Connecticut Governor Jodi Rell listen as U.S. President George W. Bush speaks during a meeting... JFK Airport Terror Plot Kevorkian released from prison Mother, 4 children found hanged in Texas Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (Learn about My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/gates_foundation_global_health Gates Foundation offers Wa. school &#36;105M - Yahoo! News Gates Foundation offers Wa. school &#36;105M AM ET SEATTLE - The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation is giving $105 million to the University of Washington to open a new research center to assess the performance of global health programs. The donation, announced Monday, is the largest private gift the university has ever received, school President Mark A. Emmert said. The university, which receives more government money for scientific research than any other public university, is also putting $20 million toward the new institute. "There has been a huge increase in resources for global health in recent years, and it's essential to evaluate the impact of these investments. With high-quality data, we can ensure resources go where they are needed most, and dramatically improve health care delivery," said Dr. Tadataka Yamada, president of the Gates Foundation's Global Health Program, in a statement issued before the announcement. The Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation will be directed by Christopher J.L. Murray, the former director of Harvard's institute for public health. Murray was chosen to lead the Ellison Institute for World Health at Harvard until last year, when Oracle Corp. founder Larry Ellison pulled the $115 million he had promised to Harvard. Gates Foundation offers Wa. school $105M AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Ill. students lose diplomas over cheers AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Ohio School Fears Cuts Will Rewrite Its Success Story at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Arkansas court ends school-funding suit AP via Yahoo! News, May 31 Going to Great Lengths for Math BusinessWeek via Yahoo! News, May 28 The art of science fair success at Boston Globe, May 03 At graduation, reflections on race The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, May 30 Higher education's missing soul The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, May 25 Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/smuggling_children Yahoo! News AMANDA LEE MYERS, Associated Press Writer PHOENIX - An increasing number of illegal immigrants who left their children back home are hiring complete strangers to bring the youngsters into this country by bluffing their way past U.S. border inspectors. Typically, the stranger poses as the child's mother or another relative as she drives through a checkpoint. Sometimes the children are given cough syrup to sedate them and ensure they don't say or do anything to make border guards suspicious. U.S. officials say they are seeing more such cases because stepped-up enforcement along the border has made it more dangerous to sneak into the country by trekking across the desert. "People who may be afraid or think it's too dangerous to bring a child through the desert when it's 120 degrees think it's better to place a child in the hands of a total stranger," said Roger Maier, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Texas. U.S. officials warned that entrusting children to a stranger is foolish, too. "There's no guarantee that you're going to be reunited with your child. There's no guarantee that your child is being cared for," said Brian Levin, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Arizona. Nevertheless, officials at the border could not cite a specific case of a child being hurt or stolen in the smuggling scheme. Dozens of U.S. citizens, permanent residents and other women with a legal right to be in this country have been prosecuted in the past few years for trying to smuggle children into the U.S. Border officials said they do not have exact numbers but believe such cases are on the rise. The women are typically poor, and are hired by smugglers for $100 to $500 for the transaction. They are often mothers themselves, and use their own children's birth certificates when they drive through a checkpoint. "They're a vulnerable class of people who get sucked into this," said Joel Parris, an assistant federal public defender in Tucson who has defended several women smugglers. "These women are so focused on surviving and taking care of their own kids, when someone comes with a pity trip, their sympathy is so strong they can't resist." Ana Meza-Montano, a 36-year-old single mother from Agua Prieta, Mexico, across the border from Douglas, Ariz., had a border crossing card that allowed her to enter the United States for short periods to shop and run other errands. Meza-Montano was caught at the Douglas port of entry trying to smuggle a 1-year-old girl who she said was her daughter. Parris, who defended her, said Meza-Montano agreed to the transaction because a smuggler offered to pay off her son's $100 bicycle, which was on layaway at a Wal-Mart. The woman is serving a 15-month prison sentence. Sandra Ramirez, a 24-year-old single mother of four, was caught trying to sneak an 11-year-old boy through the Nogales, Ariz., port of entry, and said a co-worker offered her $1,000 to do it. Now Ramirez is serving a 15-month prison sentence and will be deported to Mexico after she gets out. "This is just one of the most overwhelmingly saddest cases," said Ramirez's lawyer, Stephanie Meade. "She had no idea of the kind of consequences and trouble that she would get in." Officials say the smuggling tactic has become more common partly because more illegal immigrants are deciding to bring their families into the country. In the past, it was more common for men to leave their families behind and return periodically for visits. Also, because of tighter enforcement by the Border Patrol and the National Guard, illegal immigrants who want to sneak across the desert are being forced to make the attempt along more remote, more rugged &#151; and more dangerous &#151; stretches of the border. The U.S. Attorney's Office in Arizona has made prosecuting these child-smuggling cases one of its top priorities. "Children are being put in situations where the risk of something happening to them is high, and we felt that people need to be held accountable for this," spokesman Wyn Hornbuckle said. He added: "There are many examples of how violent these smuggling organizations are and how ruthless they've become, and they'd be the last people I'd entrust my kids to." U.S. Customs and Border Protection: Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Attorney Stephanie Meade, shown in her office in Tucson, Ariz., Wednesday, May 30, 2007, represents... Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/nh_quakes Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast - Yahoo! News Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AM ET EXETER, N.H. - After people called 911 to report hearing explosions, emergency officials initially thought there had been underground methane gas blasts. But it turns out that New Hampshire actually had three small earthquakes over the weekend. The tremors caused no damage or injuries. The state Emergency Management Agency said the quakes were felt Saturday night and Sunday afternoon in the Portsmouth-Exeter area. listed two of the quakes as magnitudes 1.4 and 1.9. A magnitude for the third quake was not available. Initially, officials investigated whether the sounds and tremors were caused by underground methane gas explosions, and the naturally occurring gas was found escaping from the ground in Portsmouth on Saturday. However, authorities were able to rule that out as the cause, Assistant Fire Chief Steven Achilles said. He said the methane gas discovery was either a coincidence or a result of the tremors. New Hampshire experiences an average of three to four earthquakes per year, most of them so minor they aren't even felt, said Jim Van Dongen, spokesman for the state Office of Emergency Management. Full Coverage: Earthquakes and Volcanoes Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AP, AM ET Thousands displaced by China quake AP, AM ET A very British response as earthquake strikes Kent at The Independent (UK), May 01 'We heard a massive rumble' at BBC, Apr 28 Earthquake damage closes school at BBC, Apr 30 Quake will cost insurers millions at BBC, Apr 30 Disaster requires unity, not dissent at The Age, Apr 04 Mt Mayon enters its 'most dangerous' phase at Korea Herald, Aug 14 Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/us/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/airman_shooting Airman testifies about deputy shooting - Yahoo! News Airman testifies about deputy shooting By GILLIAN FLACCUS, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 44 minutes ago SAN BERNARDINO, Calif. - An war veteran testified Monday that a deputy ordered him to get up from the ground twice during a videotaped confrontation after a car chase and then shot him three times when he tried to comply. Senior Airman Elio Carrion said the deputy swore repeatedly at him as he tried to explain that he was in the military and was not a threat as he lay near the passenger-side door. "I said, 'I'm in the military, I'm in the (expletive) military. Believe me, we mean you no harm,'" Carrion testified. "And the officer says, 'OK, get up' and I repeat that I'm going to get up, and as I get up, he shoots me." Former San Bernadino Sheriff's Deputy Ivory J. Webb Jr., 46, has pleaded not guilty to felony charges of voluntary attempted manslaughter and assault with a firearm. If convicted, he could face more than 18 years in prison. Deputy District Attorney Lewis Cope replayed an amateur video of the Jan. 29, 2006, shooting recorded by a bystander and broadcast on TV stations nationwide. Carrion, 23, showed no emotion as he watched the footage that showed him being shot in the chest, left leg and left shoulder. His relatives in the audience appeared to struggle to hold back tears. Webb's lawyer said during the trial's opening statements that Webb may have told Carrion, "Don't get up!" He also said that just seconds before the gunfire, Carrion's hand moved toward his jacket pocket &#151; something police often believe means a suspect is going for a weapon. Authorities later determined Carrion was unarmed. Carrion testified that Webb never told him to stay on the ground. He said that in the minutes after the shooting, he thought he was going to die and struggled to stay conscious. The video shows him face-down on the street and his hands cuffed behind him, as more police cars arrive. He recalled asking other deputies why Webb had shot him. "There was one time when someone asked me if I was OK. I said 'yeah.' I said, I believe, 'Why did he shoot me? He told me to get up and he shot me three times,'" Carrion testified. Carrion did not remember if the person replied. "At the time, I thought if I close my eyes or if I see black, I don't know if I'll wake up next time," he said. Carrion testified earlier that he began the night at a barbecue held in his honor as he prepared to return to his base in Louisiana after a 30-day leave from Iraq. Carrion and Luis Escobedo left the party in a friend's 2004 blue Corvette. Both had been drinking, and soon a deputy was in pursuit as the Corvette reached speeds of 100 mph. Carrion said he begged his friend to pull over after noticing a patrol car behind them. Escobedo lost control of the 2004 blue Corvette, crashed into a concrete wall, went into a spin and ended up hood-to-hood with Webb's patrol car, Carrion said. Viewed - U.S. Hilton begins jail term a day early video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
